It’s no Skyrim, but for $5, I’ll take it. The game is available on PC/Mac, PS3, and XBox Live Arcade. See the trailer here: http://www.telltalegames.com/walkingdead
Submissions for the AlterEgo Barbiezz Competition will end on Sunday, the 20th.
My heart skipped a beat.
And there you’d be, my destiny, it’s you I’d recognise.
After I was finished with my stamping I decided that my card still needed some color and so I added a bit of sponging along the bottom/ground. I first began lightly sponging using chocolate chip ink (ever so lightly) and then I went upward using wild wasabi.
Being a young 21 year old who moved 500 miles to purposely be apart from her, I do not find this surprising.
Sleepy.... so.... sleepy.....eyes....drooping.....stay....awake...
Now in this passage it appears that Peter said here that the Lord Jesus Christ has TWO above him. One is God and the other is the Father. So now there is here 1. God and 2. the Father and 3. the Lord Jesus Christ. However God in this passage is one and the Father is one. Jesus is one. So far it is three. However the first two are the same or are they? Who is God the first person or is the first person the Father?
I felt so depressed and angry with myself but it was not something that I could predict. I had no idea Whitney Houston was going to die, and feel terrible that she did like right after I posted that blog. In any event, that blog has gotten the most hits out of all my freaking blogs, and I’m really glad people see that I was not making fun of her situation, just the way her looks have deteriorated because she abused illegal drugs (not crack).
What was the last life insurance policy you sold? In this environment, probably a good number of financial professionals would say a universal life (UL) policy with a guaranteed death benefit. If that was your answer, the next question is was no-lapse UL the only product considered? If yes, you may want to consider additional product options for planning flexibility and to avoid limiting your clients’ options.
Moreover, the 1917 Code of Canon Law explicitly permitted a woman to say the server's responses from the pews if no one else is available to say them (on the basis that it really is supposed to be a dialogue, and Mass without anyone but the priest present was reserved for cases of emergency only, such as the need to consecrate in order to give Viaticum).
Drumlines from across the country traveled to Brooklyn to compete in the event, which benefits the Brooklyn Steppers Marching Band.
secondary school has tuition fees (which you can get loans for), and
glistens from their limbs;
in the rain......now remember....no garden club will have me
If implemented, the proposal could see major banks losing the accounts of government entities.
laser eye surgery can provide the freedom you need to do the sports or activities you enjoy. Our site provides information regarding a variety of eye laser surgery methods and procedures.
I have dreams about killing myself. I have dreams about dying. I have dreams about running away and not being here anymore. I have dreams about being surrounded by people I can’t see or communicate with. I just can’t ever connect with them.
Drug Stabbing Time
She saw her doctor today and was told that she is stable for the moment, but any little thing could upset her balance again. We still haven't heard any results from last weekend's tests.
When the kids are drying off and in various stages of getting dressed, running around naked, screaming, and laughing, wash out the tub, gather up your dirty towels along with their things and back yourself out of your blitzed bathroom.
﻿ Strange the pleasure I was able to take in wiping tiny fingerprints from the glass doors, in washing dishes and scraping grills, simply to be a part of the grand Waffle House experience (which I envision like the Jimi Hendrix Experience, with more carbs and less acid.)
It is believed that South Yorkshire probation trust has submitted plans not only to manage offenders and run programmes to reduce reoffending rates as part of the joint G4S bid, but also on the wider management of the jails. “This is not a sub-contracting situation but us going into business with G4S. I can’t see how this will benefit our members and I think they will struggle with the notion of bidding against public sector prisons,” said a union source at South Yorkshire probation trust.
My cake pics:
This weekend, however, I did manage to knock out all of the top hats that needed doing.
singing in the car
were at work grandpa would spend his time in the park, walking, watching the children play and
Sephora's own 664 (971)
I certainly am politically opposed to oppression. Whether someone thinks I am correct or not to hold this position is of little concern to me.
I am going to tell you a story. It's about a boy and a girl. It took place a little over 9 years ago in a far off land called Phoenix, Arizona. A very disillusioned girl was trying to get her lonely life on the right track. She went to church, found friends, and sang on the worship team. She was happy and even had a crush on a boy. This boy had the sweetest little girl and they would all make the perfect family. BUT there was this other boy who rode a motorcycle, played guitar and generally was NOT liked by our heroine. But one night our heroine needed someone to put accompaniment to a song she wrote. So Guitar Boy and our Lonely Girl sat down and made music. Soon after she went on a trip with all her friends, including Guitar Boy. She flirted, cuddled, and did everything she could to make Guitar Boy understand that she no longer hated him BUT that her heart went pitter-patter for him. But guitar boy was a little slow in the romance department SO our brave heroine had to TELL him. "Uh, dude, I like you."
Needless to say, having a business reporter for a girlfriend has its privileges.
Reports from insiders suggest that when told that Disney were Mardy, Narky, Lairy, Bolshy, Stroppy, Tetchy and Snoop Doggy over the whole affair, Arsène responded that he was pleased that they were updating the story but he really didn’t care what the Seven Dwarfs thought of his decision.
2 ea Wyeast Scottish Ale, 1728 XL (activator pack).
Annika casts her towel away with ease, as does Penny. Why do I feel reluctant? After all, I'm a doctor. I know what the female form looks like! Is it because they are still so young, and I am um...more mature. Still, Jean-Luc has no complaints! I smile to myself.
Hounds Of Love'), and modulated it into a swooning loop.
When scotch is not an option, I have no problems with blends (mmm, Tellamore Dew) or bourbons (give me some Jack or Jim). Really, the only liquor that I have not been into has been vodka. Just seems like something that begs for a bit of soda to help it out. While I do not drink a lot of tequila, the higher end drinks can be accepted like whiskey, and aren't as harsh as the cheap stuff.
According to Steve's Soapbox, the beer costs $2 a pint, and $16 for a growler, and $10 for the refill of said growler. And Mark is open 11 a.m. to 9 p.m. Mondays through Saturdays, 11 a.m. to 2 p.m. on Sundays.
Although Tea Party groups like Dick Armey's FreedomWorks have emphasized the movement's libertarianism and played down its social conservatism, several of Skousen's 28 principles stress the role of religious virtue. The fourth principle, "Without religion the government of a free people cannot be maintained," criticizes the Supreme Court for having misinterpreted Thomas Jefferson's metaphor of a "wall" separating church and state." Skousen argued that the First Amendment's prohibition on a federal establishment of religion wasn't intended to separate church and state but to prevent the federal government from disestablishing religion in the seven states that had officially established denominations during the founding era.
5) PARTICIPATION AT ALL SITES IS RECOMMENDED, BUT NOT REQUIRED. THE MORE SITES YOU HOP, THE BETTER YOUR CHANCES OF WINNING PRIZES.
Stylistically there was a semi-annoying habit to repeat information, instead of simply referring to the Jedi as "Jedi" they were referred to as members of the "New Jedi Order" repeatedly, and lest we forget Koax's appearance she was constantly referred to as "the one-eyed Klatoonian." These descriptions were useful but they didn't really need to be repeated as often as they were throughout the novel.
the night before I followed my nose from beer to another. The beer did
* Make a creation/project for every challenge, bare in mind this is one card every two weeks.
Your lucky – you have two…er…. actually three families now, maybe four. Beside the point - both your adoptive families and your birth family support, accept and love you. Your not alone. Its time to leave the pity party. You know the path that you should be taking – so get off your ass and take it, your the only one standing in your way. Love you.
After this uncharacteristic highlight for the franchise, The Passion of the Crust becomes a slightly different variety of intolerable. The story takes place on a film set, where Kelvin Cheatum (Moezzi) is struggling to keep his father's failing studio afloat. The Gingerdead Man (not Gary Busey) is delivered to the studio amongst a box of baked goods. As Kelvin escorts dying fan Tommy (Porter) and carer Heather (Sanders) about the place, The Gingerdead Man picks them off, one by one.
Traffic scientists liken such a situation to the sudden freezing of supercooled fluid. However, unlike a fluid, traffic flow is often affected by signals or other events at junctions that periodically affect the smooth flow of traffic.
It took me about triple the usual time to colour that image and I'm slow to start with!! Never mind the fact that I botched it up anyway. And now that I'm looking at her again I notice that I didn't finish off her eyes - properly - *headdesk*
We are not hostile towards these people. On the contrary, we pity them. But we do not want to give them an opportunity, like the Westerners, who consider this a normal phenomenon, and it has become widespread, I’m sad to say.
Feta cheese: $3.29/pkg, used BOGO free coupon ($1.65 each), used 1/2 of one pkg = $.83
Big Question from Jamie this week ! Wishcasting .... is a wonderful magical experience that I have been doing for a year or two now. It amazes me how many have come true!!
I idly toss them to the wind. Most of them just end up on the front of my robes though.
Here is a list of killings carried out in the last 2 months by the "religion of peace".
Speaking of parking lots, one of my favourite haunts – the Buffalo Grille on Bissonnet – is being torn down because the new HEB grocery store wants to exercise their parking lot rights. (Houston is famous for its lack of zoning laws, but apparently there are a few caveats.) I have been eating pancakes and BLT sandwiches at the Buffalo Grille since I was a student at Rice University, and so have many other people – but no; apparently this beloved institution has to find a new place to live.
- earth - a bureaucratic desire for extra-capsular extraction - southern lord - 2010 (lp)
a ghost of what we used to know;
Of this total 67%, or 1,838, were carried out surgically.
And I know what the pay scale was on "The Odd Couple"
I sadly don’t have any pictures of us competing, but imagine us on the show jumping track, wearing pink. She was legendary. I even snuck in a bit of pink (against the rules) when we did dressage shows. No one ever called us on it.
Supplies: Simply Scored Scoring Tool, Buttons, 1 3/8" Circle Punch, Ribbon, Glue Gun, Glue Sticks, Scissors
‘‘(g) DEFINITIONS.—In this section:
Kyle-Noel Taylor was convicted in December of four counts of assault by beating 19-year-old Rebecca Jackson following a trial at North Staffordshire Magistrates' Court.
Happy Sunday friends! Hope you are all having a lovely weekend! I know I am.
And the sight of those gondolas made me gasp with delight.
gorgeous.
Tan Sri Dr James Masing has a different understanding of democracy. He said that it is essence of democratic principle that the people “Jangan lawan tauke” (Don’t fight with the Boss or “don’t bite the hand that feeds you”) and “The rakyat (people) are the boss on polling day, they elect who should be the Boss of their lives for the next 5 years”.
At this point it is worth asking ‘what is impartiality’?
Joseph Heller:
Want more? More and more research is stacking up to support the idea that self-control is an exhaustible resource in the brain. When does this resource regenerate? Bingo! While we’re zonked out; so if your goal involves habit change (losing weight, working out more, not texting your ex) then you need to get enough sleep or you are setting yourself up for failure.
unused
Phyllis is a dear friend from high school. Phyllis was beautiful. Phyllis was funny and smart and went to a good college. Got a whiz bang job in TV. And then she married really well, to a man that she called "Daddy". They had a fun few years, she got pregnant and they had a daughter, and then he died. This was twenty-five years ago and Phyllis has never recovered. Did I mention that Phyllis' husband was SEVENTY FIVE when she married him? And that he was EIGHTY when he died?
So I went back and forth and back and forth, back yard to front, calling for my kittykittykitty. At one point when I was calling out front, a cat came running toward me from across the street. Yay!
We are back from our overseas holiday. The weather in New Zealand was quite wet and fairly cold for the middle of Summer, but we had an amazing time, and even though the weather wasn't the best, we were still able to see some of the sites and spent some time totally chilling out at my SIL's gorgeous property in Keri Keri. The only bummer is the LCD screen on my Canon camera was damaged on the way home and my little pocket camera's lens is all bent and won't focus, so I am totally without a camera until my Canon is fixed. Might have to go shopping for another pocket camera in the meantime.
So I put local farmers' carrots and my own dried rosemary in the soup, and I compost the peels to grow more herbs. I look around my home and think it's due for another makeover. I think of how I will leave my desk job and finally use that interior decorating associate's degree to its full potential. And I pin ideas from the sorts of magazines that used to horrify me on Pinterest. My 18-year-old self would shake her head at me. Thank the Gods she's not around anymore.
the second I was born
06) Bullet With Butterfly Wings
Ellen: There were many! I was a big reader of fantasy when I was a tween and young adult, and I still read the genre as much as I can. Naturally, when Abisina’s story started to spin out in my head, it was a fantasy. I love monsters and creatures and magic and mythology. I have a lot of fun playing around with the possibilities that such otherworldly ideas present.
I felt sad most of the day on Friday. My dh and I talked about it later that night – he was feeling sad too. Probably “carry over” from the candlelight vigil the night before. Sometime over the weekend we talked about buying a candle together in memory of Acacia, and taking it with us while we travel over the holidays to see family – and that we will light it each day, somewhere publicly so our family will know that we miss her, yet again, this year. I was really touched that my dh thought of this, because often I experience him as being much more private about our loss.
That vast and mighty throng
Yep! It was a great day!
All I can say is that within minutes, the position of authority had swiftly changed hands/paws and it was I who was now chasing the bitch around with a chain attached only to a collar and nothing else.(please note the context in which I have used the word bitch.)
Realistic TAO: The fierce and strong characteristics that people who practice martial arts tend to have are not found anywhere on Tao. This doesn’t mean that he’s not mature or serious enough, but towards a young 93 liner brother who is always protected by his older brothers, this all is just a bit early. But because of this, he has the child-like personality of speaking exactly what he thinks. The first time he was asked about his ideal type he avoided the question, the second however he expressed, “After thinking that this question would be asked again, I went home to properly think about it, I like……” With this sort of realistic answer laughing to tears is unavoidable.
I'm assuming it had something to do with the fact that I had found myself on the losing side of the Battle of the Bulge.
-Matte Flesh colour under brow bone and in inner corners
Most of the historical romances I read (practically all, in fact) take place in England, so it was really interesting to read a story set in a more familiar place. I loved all the details. And being in 1899 I found it so fascinating to read about places in New York that still exist-Tiffany, Lord & Taylor, mansions on 5th Ave, etc. Penelope was such a dreadful bitch! I felt the only real indication we had that Elizabeth had some personality was that Will loved her, so she must have had a side to her that was a little more warm.
ME: Eleven? Wow! You're getting pretty old.
I'm a single guy and have been rushing about all day doing my christmas shopping , I'm buggered and can't be arsed cooking tonite so I thought I'd pop into the Charcoal Chicken at Umina to pick up half a chicken and a loaf of fresh bread to make some chicken sangas for dinner , something light and easy.
When Patrick contacted me about taking him and his wife Rachel on a 3 day backpacking trip I was excited but concerned. Did she know what she was getting into? Both were quite fit and competed in marathons and Iron Man competitions so that eased my fears some. It ended up that they were prefect clients! I gave them a list of gear that they should have, proper clothing, etc – they prepared! I let them know that they needed to try and hike a bit before heading out on this trip – they prepared! I followed up with them a few days before and advised that we would have some rain – they prepared! I could not have asked for better clients for this trip!
Blawg Review #319 at The Trial Warrior Blog, by Antonin Pribetic this week, includes copious factoids and anecdotes of this day in history–including one to his Croatian roots–who knew? All of which provides an entertaining and informative backdrop for some of the best legal blog posts of recent days, curated by one of the best of the blawgosphere. It’s a longish Blawg Review, so take your time to enjoy the narrative and the links.
9) Richmond, Virginia
9 eggs, at room temperature
Working in the pose:
carefully to determine how it stacks up against their new opponent. Leave your vote for the sample that resonates with you the most. Don’t forget to offer some opinions if you have time. Anyone reading this can vote, so blog/tweet/facebook/text/smoke signal everyone you know and get them to participate as well.
Regardless of your opinion on Wenger, it is hard to argue with his reasoning. Whether or not positive changes (possibly in the form of an ethics committee) will actually be implemented in the foreseeable future is another issue, as those at the top of the English game seem set in their ways. How long will it be before common sense finally prevails?
- Emerson String Quartet - Bartók: 6 String Quartets, Disc One (captures Quartets 1, 3, and 5) - 1988
Instead of getting the “hot” deal, you should consider choosing a product that fits you and in which you are interested.
Bath is easily recognized by the "bath stone" that the buildings are made of. It is a form of limestone, and when it was quarried, they found that the stone could be angled into any shape, unlike slate, that separated into layers.
7. Ninkasi Maiden the Shade
“Blind unbelief is sure to err…” so penned William Cowper in his final and perhaps most poignant hymn, composed in 1774. Of course, Cowper wrote from a Christian perspective and, though he suffered terribly from depression, he understood that God’s ordering of and teleological purposes for creation would always prove wise and good in the end. A nation whose laws adhere to these same basic truths is able to govern itself according to the wise and good end that God has built into creation. That nation will prosper as it conforms to the actual reality of God’s creation. A nation which forsakes God’s ordering and insists on its own is—in Cowper’s words—sure to err.
So you and I can have eternal drinks in this well
Suggested by David Wright - the theme for this evening's Tuesday night shindig is Charity Shop Classics. Theme tunes, Studio 2 Stereo albums, Herb Alpert and Hallmark TOTP make-overs are all appearing on the Radio Podrophenia playlist...live from 9. It won't be a complete cheese board, we're also donating Big Beat, Beatles covers and Shirley Bassey belting out the funk.
If you are living solely for yourself- than your life is considered a waste.
In the onslaught of getting the house ready to be put on the market next week, I've ditched my project planner, it just wasn't cutting it, as I'm tackling whole rooms at a time. However, with the to do list seeming to grow with each passing hour, I was feeling really overwhelmed. Mostly, I think it was more the "when" to get things done, rather than the "what" that was overwhelming me. The long list, with the deadline of this Saturday, wasn't really cutting it, as I kept losing my focus thinking about the other 9 million things to do. So, I whipped up a quick and simple weekly planner, with lots of room to make lists, a weekly goal, and even a daily water tracker (need to stay hydrated while sorting, scrubbing and packing lol)
Damian flushed, but George nodded at him encouragingly. “Thank you, boy. You’re right,” and he leveled a warning look at the lad’s brother.
Volumes of gold and brown emerge
When you have all edges zigzagged you want to fold your square in half, wrong sides together and with a very narrow hem, sew a straight stitch down the two side edges. Leave the top edge open or it won't be a pouch! The bottom fold will be the bottom of your pouch. Do a zigzag stitch down both newly sewn sides. I thought it would be nice to have all of my seams on the outside to add a little character so the ''wrong side'' should be on the outside of your pouch and the nicely finished side should be on the inside.
If you’re a new comer the cleansing scene, then you’re diet changes must be simple and straightforward. Arrange your priorities and make sure to eliminate these foods from your diet:
The old man drew close and opened the box. Two metal gauntlets lay inside, at first Coals excitement sank. They’d be worth something but not for the risks he’d taken. Looking closer he noticed their difference they were silver, a lace of intricate patterns. They weren’t large or bulky like soldier’s gauntlets, they were more like gloves, the metal so thin and the fingers! There were gaps between the metal on the fingers, delicately linked like a spider’s web allowing the wearer to move their hands like normal. Coal picked them up without invitation and put them on. Strangely on the palm was a clear circle of glass, held by more metal attached to the rest of the gauntlet. Entranced by their beauty he didn’t hear what the old man was babbling about.
This category has five titles listed because there was a tie on number of votes and first place choices. I'm utterly amazed that no Doctor Who episodes made the shortlist: I thought "The Doctor's Wife", especially, a dead cert, given that Neil Gaiman wrote it and how much he is loved by BFS members. In fact I thought we’d have an all- or near-all Who shortlist. There were fourteen episodes of Who on last year, so maybe the vote got split. We’ll have a better idea when the BFS releases its complete list of everything that was recommended. I’m delighted to see Midnight in Paris on there (which was my pick), and Attack the Block too. I haven’t seen the others yet. Kill List doesn’t look like a fantasy film; but I'm afraid to ask about it in case finding out about the fantasy element turns out to be a spoiler!
Wilson is hallucinating in House’s living room. There’s a boy there and it was one of Wilson’s patients. The boy wants to know why he died if he didn’t do anything wrong. Then the little boy morphs into House. Wilson is in really bad shape, guys. He’s even busting into House’s personal stash of painkillers. House really loves Wilson if he’s willing to give up his Vic. Wilson moves into the anger stage of grief.
This is an amazing success story. It was told to me by a very good friend who swore me to secrecy about the names and details. It goes something like this.
I have no problems with technology being used in concert with a traditional teacher-student learning situation. Replacing the traditional entirely with technology, however, isn't feasible and should not be advisable.
Give me your hands cos you're wonderful.
It's still cooling off here...this morning it is chilly...although the weatherman says it is still supposed to be in the 70's...will we ever see winter again?? The temps have been great for all the gardening...but I have been too distracted by the nice weather and I am way behind on the inside things I must do...like sewing, and getting my house back in shape after the holiday decor came down...so...
We decided to have new doors made for our olden cabinets and the interior of the cabinets all painted up nicely with oil based paint.
the smoking area at the hospital was specifically constructed to be a place of peace. it was almost disgusting how cliche and corny it was. there were two picnic tables that had a giant oak tree in between them, providing a shady shelter that made it appear to be either dusk or dawn in the morning and afternoon. against the side of the wall were some stone structures that might have been relaxation waterfalls or something at some point, but were now just a bunch of ugly, stacked rocks. somebody apparently had stopped giving a fuck about keeping up with the place, and now – when you add in all the sad people roaming around with permanent clouds of smoke surrounding their heads – it was just as depressing as a morgue.
Wednesday - BBQ Chicken Ranch Salads: We have a late appointment so these salads will be easy to throw together before we have to head out the door.
*Everything that I talk about in this post is what I have read or know to be true. If there is any inconsistencies, please let me know with some sort of source that I may look up for my own reference to correct any errors*
Not just no, HELL NO!
Rating: ***
We had a busy evening with homework and dance class so I let the kids get happy meals on the way home from Mary's house for his birthday. It was so nice we actually played outside awhile, ate McDonalds, he opened his presents from us and played with them while I took Callie to dance.
Anyway, back to the food. I can't cook, I have limited funds, BUT I live in a great place for cheap healthy food and I'm pretty smart. So here's the challenge: send me stuff to cook. Easy, idiot proof and inexpensive are my only parameters. I never seem to get too invested in the recipes in the magazines that claim to be simple. I want fun stuff that's easy that I can bring into my regular everyday life. Mind you, I'm single, so I don't need to make elaborate dishes that can feed an army. Lets' just get me cooking.
who really knows with these things? In fact I'm not even sure what anything is anymore...this is supposed to be my Friday (well Thursday's night jump on Friday's) hops... but with joining in on Leah's Giving Thanks Challenge from South Breeze Farm
My second day in Italy, Stacey and I hopped on a train to go to Bologna for the day. This was my first time in Bologna, and I instantly fell in love. This is one of the most welcoming cities I’ve ever been to. Everyone there greeted us with a smile, everyone we asked to give us directions didn’t hesitate and people were more than willing to help you in any other way.
A call to Tobi was in order. I absolutely adore her. She's done all of Izzy's photos since she was born. You can check out Tobi's site Zanteen Photography here, and her blog here.
The Pentagon has been forced to take extraordinary measures to meet the Bush Administration’s operational demands:
Eating Disorders Center
Mystery in this landscape is a certainty, an eloquent one. There is everywhere silence—a silence in thunder, in wind, in the call of doves, even a silence in the closing of a pickup door. If you are crossing the plains, leave the interstate and find a back road on which to walk; listen. —R.A., 1978
To be continued. Father in the name of Jesus I pray that as we have trusted the work on the cross to redeem our spirit, soul, and body that we would trust you in the small things and continue to cling to your every word and promise. We thank you for salvation we also thank you for preservation unto Eternal Glory, help us to understand your GRACE and that it is truly finished that we may walk unhindered into the destiny you have for us. I pray and ask this in the mighty name of Jesus. Theres power in the name of Jesus!
...but then my Handsome Honey says he immediately stopped, cuz he felt that the Lord knew and had the one picked out for him. (Good thing!)
The weekend before our dinner plans, I got really sick. How I managed to drag myself into work that Monday still puzzles me to this day. Not wanting to spread my sick bugs too far, I sent Vikki a message to let her know that I was sick and could not meet up for dinner. She was very understanding and we postponed our plans until January. Luckily we postponed dinner as I lost my voice and it would have been a very quiet dinner. Even by the end of that week, I was still struggling and searching for my voice.
The following story is a perfect example of why these judges are dangerous and must be removed from our judicial system:
1. enter and WIN one of those challenges sponsored by Robyn's Fetish Digital Stamps And More. I listed them for you above.
(Barbra Streisand cover) (From "Funny Girl")
This machine must now be rebooted in order to ensure
Back facts: Luzinski may have been a natural 1st sacker, but he played only 32 games of his 15-year major league career at first base. Thirty of those games came in 1971 and 1972.
I just wanted to share some pictures we took last week...
……….(after Goldsmith)
Jordan giving me a foot massage, the best ever!!
I WILL confess, one of my “pet peeves” is people talking loudly on cell phones in public places. It drives me wild. And what makes it even worse is that most of those conversations are pure blather.
My new boyfriend wanted to learn to ride and we let him try Amalia. She was at her best behavior and so charming that she could have melted anyone’s heart. She did not get sold that day, my boyfriend did. Once again Amalia had chosen her rider.
What a wonderful young man you have become.
We had one car – an ancient station wagon. One house we lived in was close enough to where my dad worked that he could walk to work, so he often did, to save money.
The museum entrance fee is RM12.00 (approx $3.69) and is well worth the visit. The Qur'an and Manuscript Gallery is but one small part of the museum but contains a respectable number of beautiful books. I have included a small sample from my photographs below (photography is permitted in the museum, provided a flash is not used).
Redhook Ale Brewery Winterhook Winter Ale
In some ways, of course, those who voted Tory are the most shameful, in their hearts the average Tory voter knows the truth but they dare not face it and would sacrifice their children before they do.
Bed Buddy Hot and Cold Pack - $2.75/1 - expires 4/30/2011
There should be some caramel left over in the sauce – Don’t trash that yet! At medium-low setting, pour in the milk and cream, and gently stir until all the caramel is incorporated into the milky broth.
The clue of the title and the flowers themselves directed Knight towards a reading that the piece serves as an effective elegy, an elegy that is apt for this moment in time: “Electronic wallpaper of raining flowers suggests petals strewn on a sacred path and mournful tributes cast on a grave. Virtually hypnotic, it creates a gentle space for reflection. In this post-Sept. 11 period of death and distraction, their ambiguity feels just right.” However, I think the ambiguity did not feel just right, and I wanted to think about possible reasons why.
On Monday evening, May 23, Harold Camping showed back up at the Family Radio studios for a live broadcast of his call-in show, Open Forum, along with a short press conference at the end. If anyone was waiting for an “apology” from Harold Camping for his prophetic failure, for regrets expressed for people’s lives being torn up by foolish decisions and sacrifices they may have made to be part of his Rapture brigade, they were quickly disappointed.
The postman delivered them just in time for the Easter holidays, so I have been totally soaked in Vintage Summer Basics this weekend.
Tuesday Blech, I feel worse today. Good thing I went to the doctor and got anitbiotics. I'll be fine by Friday.
-In addition to the relationship theme, it also covers career aspirations, and giving up / realizing dreams, which keeps things from going one note. It goes off into some interesting and hilarious tangents with Segel’s character development.
one for each disciple.
5. Silver Indian pendant, $1
“Stop being thankful for it”
The Third definition strikes me as a bit unlikely because of what I know about the author–but the relationship to the term “immanent” to this definition is more fruitful than it might first appear. With a basic meaning of “within/inherent/taking place within the mind of the author/existing in the the realm of matter and time”–the term “immanent” seems to be much more related to my understanding of how to create stories than “transcendent” would be…. but more on this later..
She came back with wonderful drawings of cartoon-like cows and sheep, which were great fun but none of them seemed quite right. (Sally has kindly allowed me to show you these first sketches.)
Frank: so remove criminal penalties on marijuana
At the white, sleeping town;
He authors consternated, greedy love-making,
Descrip. 124 p.
They talked about the fish they had caught on the lake and the places they had caught them.
And as Young Adult authors dig deep into their own pasts, their own emotions and memories, and connect them to the present to create stories that touch the intended YA audience, it is no small wonder that other adults are increasingly turning to YA fiction. Those years represent some of the best, the most vibrant and intense years of our lives – why on earth would we not want to recapture them in some way? Particularly so if words on a page wring poignant reminders, stir deep wells of memory, evoke gleeful laughter (and possibly waves of embarrassment!), and are as beautifully written and richly evocative as so much YA fiction is.
Didn't work.
Audit your time. Overworked people often fail. Disciple requires that you learn to say no, delegate or ignore certain requests otherwise interruptions prevail and derail your progress.
I am excited to say that me and Second Grade is Spendid are going to get mani/pedis tomorrow.. it's been a while since I treated myself, and it is definitely the week to do it!
Linicin catalog, available web based at chemist. You may want cleaner and car seats in the car. After Evies hair with electric comb to detect and kill the lice, I spray the hair, which helps me to spray on every areas of head lice to collect. This is caused by scratching of the head in a attempt to ease itching.
This isn’t exactly a new idea. An exhibition has been, and will continue to travel the world for years, showing costumes and props within recreated settings and other smaller exhibitions have happened elsewhere (such as Harrod’s recreation of Diagon Alley for the release of the last film on DVD). But this is on a far more extravagant scale and the area the items are housed in (sound stages J & K co-incidentally) has real relevance to the films, as this was where many of the scenes using the sets being shown were
he only wants to read dinosaur books.
I would recommend this if you are interested in Victorian sci fi and are already bored to death with the big names. However, it is never going to be considered a great American novel, except perhaps, by the likes of Rush Limbaugh and Glen Beck.
Too often we base our beliefs of the physical on Greek philosophy rather than the Bible. Plato wrote in the Republic that there are two realms: The Transcendent Realm (The Forms) and the Material Realm. The material realm is all that we see around us, whereas the Transcendent Realm is the the Realm of The Forms. The ultimate form was that of Goodness, the form of all forms. This invisible realm was where true reality was according to Plato, and the material realm, the world we occupy, is nothing more than a obscure, dim, misleading at times representation of that true realm. Though this is a simplification x1000, you get the idea that for Greeks, the physical world was for many that which obstructed our view of truth and reality and therefore, for many Greeks, the physical world was looked down on. With this in mind, doesn’t this seem more like our attitude in the Church rather than what is shouted and screamed and celebrated (graphically and erotically I might add) in the book of Song of Solomon?
I blow a fuse, and the two of us go into a catfight, with Will standing a discreet distance away. We pull at each other's hair, then kick and scratch. Eventually, we grapple and roll over. I bash her head against the ground underneath.
The war between reason and unreason exists at many levels of the self, but it doesn’t exist at the level of the true self. A river has turbulent currents until you reach the very bottom, where the water is calm and barely flows. This has been the position of the world’s wisdom traditions, and the true self has gone under different names: Atman, spiritus, the soul and many others. A true experimental philosophy, which sounds like a very good idea, would test the proposition that unity lies beyond duality. That is what philosophy has tried to do since the beginning. For a conflicted gay Christian, such a journey seems far more promising that batting him around between various opinions, right and left.
It's totally worth a visit. The cakes were fantastic and we filled our little table with tea, scones and lots of choux pastry much to the amusement of the people that worked there. The tea room was really cosy and full of random art work and after a little bit of research, I found out were created by people such as Noel Fielding. Traditional but also a bit quirky? Yep, I liked it a lot and I can't wait to go back.
I told him, "Mommy's just sad."
The crowds have flocked to John the Baptist to hear his preaching about the kingdom of heaven and to prepare for the kingdom by confessing their sins and being baptized. It was an extraordinary act of humility for a Jew to submit to baptism. Baptism was reserved for unrighteous pagans. For a Jew to be baptized was to admit that they were just as unrighteous as a Gentile, even the Romans.
From the taxpayers?
or take him for a walk,
I'm feeling better today. Yesterday I was not myself and moped around the house flapping my ears and hiding in corners. Perp. thought maybe I was homesick since I ran out to the van and tried to get in every time I escaped when someone opened the front door. Today I'm back to my perky self and am letting everyone know that all attention should be directed at me and not the "other one." I often have to jump in the way or bark or move their hand when someone tries to pet him instead of me to remind them I'm cuter than some old black lab.
Now in this new year of January 2012, many thrilling books have been released, sitting in the bookstores waiting for people like you and me to ﻿pick up and indulge!
Me and my dad always beg my mom to make Christmas bread. It’s a delicious type of bread that is topped with icing. We try to get mom to make it as many times as possible.
The finished ad above has everything I wanted. It shows a runner in regular clothes “owning his house,” which is the environment he is running in. Additionally, the style, while not perfect, felt like something you would see in a real Under Armour ad. It’s gritty and features action and intensity. Since this ad went from photographed to finished in under an hour, it wasn’t as polished or well thought out as I wanted, but it worked as a concept. The rest of my group liked the idea and had confidence in the style. Inspired, I set out to coordinate and shoot a more organized and thought-out concept.
Savor the sweetness of young love and be inspired by Gelo and Honey.
HIT (High Intensity Training)!! In the programme, Dr Mosley demonstrated HIT by using an exercise bike for 1 minute, 3 times a week, for 4 weeks. This was to prove whether the scientists view that 3 minutes of exercise a week (in 1 minute bursts) for 4 weeks could bring about significant changes to your body.
Although in all these countries there are many non-Jews every whit as bad as the worst of the Jewish revolutionaries, the part played by the latter in proportion to their numbers in the population is astonishing. The fact that in many cases Jewish interests and Jewish places of worship are excepted by the Bolsheviks from their universal hostility has tended more and more to associate the Jewish race in Russia with the villainies which are now being perpetrated”.
Holy time, yes
The current wheel design features 11 solid spokes, which have a slight “H” section to them. As the side faces of each spoke are machined with a small pocket to reduce weight. Its visible that the outer face of each spoke has sharp right-angled edge. However less visible in the inside face of each wheel spoke, features a generous fillet radius to help the streamline the spoke to improve airflow out of the wheel.
A final year student in Mechanical Engineering at NUS, Sun Xu triggered nationwide outrage with his now infamous remarks on there ‘being more dogs than humans in Singapore’, prompting many Singaporeans to call for his scholarship to be revoked, including Tay Ping Hui who openly called him an ‘impertinent ingrate’.
Luckily, Fullers were able to get hold of some Plumage Archer barley, which they then had malted by Simpson's. The variety dates from 1903. Which is about as close as you're going to get. It was malted in drum maltings, which were being used in 1891.
It's because these blasted sticky things didn't work. Boo. I had high hopes. I will now be taking more desperate measures to get this baby hung on my wall... I will be visiting the fine folks over at Lowes this weekend to see if they can help me out with some heavy duty hooks.... Do any of you abode lovers have any tips for hanging heavy platters on the wall???
I understand why this movie isn’t well received. It’s schlock. The plot, the characters, everything about it is just low-grade thriller. And I don’t really love it for that; the acting included. As much as I like Nicholas Cage, and the role he played in moving action heroes away from the Stallones and the Van Dammes (which was a positive in my opinion), he really does feel samey in many of his movies. This movie is no exception, and apart from being a zany actor for a odd-ball role, I can’t really see any other reason to have him as the star. I would have picked another actor for this one, not sure which one but not Cage. Yeah, I understand he was made for these kind of parts, but meh. He doesn’t really seem to have any chemistry with the romance and Biel. Speaking of Biel, I don’t think I really like her as an actress. Yeah, she’s gorgeous, but you need more than that to be a compelling character, and she certainly does not bring it here. The character is one-dimensional and forgettable, and I’m sorry but Biel just relies too much on looks and not enough on an ability to act in my opinion. As for Julianne Moore, I don’t want you to think that I have something against her for this and the Blindness article but I don’t think she is good in this. Not because of her really, it seems like she was just not a good fit for this movie. I’m actually a bit surprised to see her in it to be honest. I do like her, just not in what I have talked about thus far.
5. Come over at l0 a.m., make me eggs, toast and a 1/2 grapefruit. Clean my fridge and throw out everything you are in doubt about. Don’t ask me about anything; just use your best judgment.
I'm currently finishing a little lilac cardigan, which is one of my favourite simple designs with a pretty lacy edging. I'm hoping to knit up a few of these in different colours as I just adore knitting these little cardigans.
I TRIED TO MAKE CLOUDS
LET'S DO OUR BEST FOR THINKING DAY 2012! :D
When she came to, her head was pounding. She couldn’t remember what she’d been doing or where she’d been, but it felt as though she’d been out on a bender. Flat on her back, she tried to roll over onto her side. But couldn’t. Through burning eyes her focus began to clear. Bile rose in her gut as the vision of herself lying naked, prostrate and bound slammed fear into every one of her senses. All she could move was her head. She stared about, frantic. And then she found her voice.
Vader: How is old Obes these days?
Yaaaay!!!
*kills an ant making its way across the space bar*
That’s what it feels like right now.
Today’s series is going to cover an issue everyone in the games industry is struggling really hard to control. That issue is none other then those swashbuckling console modifying pirates yarrrrr! Fact is piracy is a massive issue and it is one that is nearly impossible to tackle. Fact is pirates are not stopped by laws they aren’t stopped often by law suites they are rarely hindered by espionage. Pirates are thieves who steal software that doesn’t belong to them causing companies to go bankrupt.
Anyway, I figure this could be a fun one! It is what you make it ;)
At least one member of the Court of Criminal Appeals agreed. "Personally, I think the dog-scent stuff, particularly as done by Pikett, is junk science and should never have come into court," Judge Cheryl Johnson said. Absurdly, prosecutors told jurors at trial that the dog-scent lineup was "as good as DNA." Winfrey's attorney, Shirley Baccus-Lobel, told the CCA that "The problem with bad science masquerading as science is it results in attaching a significance to unremarkable events." San Jacinto County prosecutors told the court that although the case was circumstantial and "parts of it are weak," they should uphold the conviction anyway. (I know, you're shocked.)
You've been bringing me watered-down whisky all night did you think that I couldn't taste?
One point of order on this red-light camera controversy is that the cameras only take your picture when you break the law. There’s no need for a Big Brother Conspiracy Theory here, because honestly, what would a red-light camera really show us if it was trained upon a poor minority neighborhood? Drug deals? Prostitution? Gang violence? Lonely and desperate humanity? Who needs to see that? We get that already on pop culture TV.
Anycrazy...
I have this vessel out on display at home and I've always loved it. Love the colour, love the shape, love the glossiness... basically I just love everything about it. This is the first time I used it in a composition and I can say with certainly that I'll use it again. Even though the composition for this is really very simple it made me appreciate the difficulty in getting things 'just right' in terms of placement and lighting. That said, I enjoyed the process since I learned something. Yes, I am trainable.
Do not read beauty magazines. They will only make you feel ugly.
Bugger this for a game of marbles...I'm just going to choose ONE. Always was crap at keeping to the rules. It's why I'm so bad at table tennis. And Fish. (anyone else play that DREADFUL game?? when you ask people for cards and they say Fish if they haven't got it and the winner gets loads of cards and the losers get none? No? Not ringing any bells? You lucky, lucky thing. Bad bad game.)
A palliative care doctor shared with us that she often tells her dying patients this: “Don’t think of God as a hunter who’s going to shoot you when you’re least prepared. Rather, think of Him as a gardener who’s picking the most beautiful flower in the garden to bring home to His loved ones.” God always does what’s good and, as a Father, He never really wants to see His children suffer. It’s Satan who’s going Columbine on all of us is what I’m saying. In a way, it sounds a bit like sour-graping, doesn’t it? Because, really, what would you rather be: a deer or a flower?
But the world may be a better place because
Locke-"Why did Charles bring you back to the Island?"
Initially, Sarah’s response differed little from her husband’s response. He laughed too when God spoke to him the last time about a son. Now, Sarah was laughing as well. What was their laughter all about? Maybe it was a combination of surprise, shock, sheer joy, and unbelief. How could such a thing be? One wonders if Sarah’s laughter was not heard outside the tent.
6. Portion sizes must be small so that you have room to taste every course of the evening, so feel free to reduce recipes in half where ever you see fit.
Love this rock.
The Great Ray Charles (1957)
"Around 1750 a new strain of hop was introduced to the Farnham growers by a Mr Peckham-Williams of Badshot Place, Badshot Lea (a small village in the parish of Farnham). This was a White Bine Grape hop, and was to become famous as the Farnham White Bine, which would be grown in the Farnham hop grounds until the disastrous inter-war years, when the blight hit so badly the growers changed to another variety". (5)
1. The youth SONrise service was quite frankly one of the best worship experiences I’ve had in my life…period. Thought you should know.
Step 2: Lightly sprinkle with salt evenly, and set aside for about 10 minutes. When it looks like a little bit of water has been removed, rinse quickly in cold water and drain.
I tried using my Papa’s pliers, but I grabbed on to a tooth instead and missed that little bothersome piece of pineapple altogether.
Maybe not
Brief Synopsis: The TARDIS arrives in the middle of no man's land during WWI, or does it?
The specifics of the thought experiment are a little silly, though not entirely implausible. It’s also a drawback that he lumps all of the populist anger together into one category. That’s a bit insulting to middle class intellligence, but maybe Reich is right. In any case, his main point – that capitalism needs to be saved from itself – is poignant.
6 interest
not list a Pedder, and I can not find any other reference that looks
MBD & Silk Whitia Face Mask
Others who are not yet ready to exist on such higher realms of Living will naturally find themselves departing Earth. We say to you all now, do not fear what is to come. Do not fear the passing of those who are not yet ready to exist in the new energy. Give Love in all situations you see occurring, as this period you now find yourselves in is so very important, and we wish we could fully communicate the scope of how important it really is. Do not fear this transition – embrace it.
“Whazzatripldoub?”
It's great he's having a good time but in my opinion Alex being in Seattle really sucks. When left by myself during a stressful and emotionally turbulent time, my brain don't work too good. Stuff like this keeps happening --
All in all, bearing in mind that this is just a throw-away booklet in a puzzle box, and not the full-scale novel I had hoped for, it's not too bad (note the contraction?!). But there are a couple of points that I would have really hoped an editor (if indeed there was one) would have picked up on. Especially since this is a 'book'(let) which actually encourages the reader to be particularly astute in order to solve the mystery. Here they are:
I will be updating soon with new "work in progress" photos of my painting + some newly released images from my 1st Earth Goddess body art photoshoot.
how we were able to cope with the era in which abandonment of our heart and spirit
In recent months the sunday papers have featured the Australian feminist Melinda Tankard Reist, who is also Christian and anti-abortion. Apparently a lot of people out there (and most of them women) feel that she can’t be a feminist due to her religious beliefs. That she should indeed be instantly disregarded on any feminist debate because of those religious beliefs.
To celebrate the release of Turning Guilt Trips into Joy Rides, Shirley, Janine and Kim are giving away some great prizes during the blog tour. Share your own "guilt trip" or "joy tip" and be entered to win a free life coaching consultation and a $50 Amazon.com gift certificate.
SARAH’S FAVORITE TRIA CAKE
While my own mother is a fantastic cook, I don’t feel she’s a good eater, and her relationship with food is questionable. So we come back to the ‘mother’ which had been a prominent theme of today’s Festival.
I am beginning an exciting journey. Chris Rice sings a song where he tells Becky to hold on cause they are going for a ride. I feel like I need to buckle up and get ready. Going from fear to freedom is an amazing thing. Try Him, taste Him, believe Him, take the ride.
What COULD’T I DO with his pants…?
THC - Yeah. They put the kibosh on that when Eisner told him that people would rather see fuzzy expressive animals instead of insects with segmented eyes, antennae, pincers...feh, I grew up on that, and I was fine with it.
I hear "Tracy are you sleeping?"
As for last night's programme, it was more interesting for what it left out. Hughes offered us a short history of goddesses from Catal Huyuk to Kali's Calcutta, taking in Cybele along the way. The emphasis was on the goddess as the arbiter of life and death, giving birth equally to live and stillborn offspring and thus (as her Telegraph article put it) "a sexually powerful creature who delights in bloodshed." Hence the goddesses selected.
Have a great creative day!
I accually forced myself to wake up so that i can watch this Arsenal and Chelsea Game and both teams were playing Sincerly well and Good,
I’m going to the Cherry Blossom Festival this week. Hell or high water. And I”m taking pictures. AND – know what else?? — I’m gonna post them here, since I’ve been such a slacker about posting here. You’d like that wouldn’t you? Yeah. I knew you would.
That He should give His only Son
Here's my impression of two seasoned Cupar locals who haven't seen each other in 30 years.
The plot is slowly starting to take shape, it’s still a mess at the moment and it will be at least another few weeks before it looks well. Everything is looking very brown, I can’t wait until the summer when I have some greenery.
TEAMWORK
Cinque said she also must always be mindful of her physical fitness, since competing in the middleweight group requires her to maintain a certain weight.
The set list is the whole six wives suite plus the piece on Henry VIII ‘Defender Of The Faith’ which never made the original album and two newly composed pieces to bookend the concert.
Harvested from mature White Sturgeons,
The horse had been one of those stubborn sorts that liked to brush people off against the nearest tree, walking through thorn bushes etc.
A treasure I received with each passing day and night
“To help explain to my blown sense what was happening and why I was here, the beings were keen to show me the universe I’d just come from and how it looked. When they did, it was one of several, inside something I recall as a kind of stall of incubators.
Her bony fingers flipped quickly through the deck so that a movie seemed to be playing before my eyes, in which I watched myself grow older, turning into the spitting image of my father. At first it pleased me that my father’s image could live on with me, but the final card shattered my heart. It was my father—me!—with a noose around his neck, hanging in the closet.
1 lb grass fed ground beef
Happy Leap Year Day!! Today is the day....in celebration of Leap your 2012 I am joining the blog hop giveaway over at Such A Sew And Sew.
Should we trust her? Can we trust her? Asked about Mental Health, she didn’t answer. A smudge.
At hindsight, it’s clear that every single one of the main characters fall into a stereotype. That isn’t a very bad thing alone, but the problem is that they never manage to break free from the clichéd character traits they’ve been given. Only Jintan and to a lesser extent Yukiatsu manage to get decent character development.
01 - I’ve Found A New BabyTurkish Mambo
When I first started out on this writing adventure, I was 23. Nine years later, and with five completed manuscripts under my belt, I remain an unpublished novelist. But the amount I've learned in those nine years is immeasurable. Once upon a time it was my goal to be published by my 30th birthday. Now, two years past deadline, I've given myself a little bit of a break and pushed it back to 35. And since technically I'm only turning eight years old today (thank you, Leap Day!), I'm actually doing pretty well for myself.
Setting up a MySpace page has been a huge surprise—it’s free and takes very little time to keep current. I’ve gotten lots of new readers who “friended” me, not necessarily because they’re readers but because they like wolves, and the title of my series is Wolf Tales. They’ve gone on to buy my entire series and even post my book trailers on their own MySpace sites. Plus, they appear more comfortable contacting me through the private message link on MySpace than they might through regular email. I like the direct connection it allows me with readers.
“You have very significant losses in the trusts and very high delinquencies and foreclosures, and when you attempt to foreclose you can’t collect,” Kaswan said.
Mystery Midrash, edited byLawrence Raphael
What is the best part of being a writer?
Yeah... blogging reaches out and touches lives. It allows us to go places we wouldn't otherwise go, and meet people we wouldn't otherwise meet. This is just one of the reasons why I blog and I ask many of you to share your stories ... your quiet time "aha" moments, your ups and your downs. In doing so we never know who we are helping.
I came across him in the sitting room. Lying on his back and talking to himself.
Remember tie-dyeing? When you went to Michael’s to buy a white tee shirt and then bunched it up into little lumps held with rubber bands? Then you dipped the shirt into solutions of dye in various hues, and when it dried and the rubber bands came off, you had those star-like hippie-style patterns on the shirt.
Sunday started out just as serenely, although I didn’t let my self turn on the TV at all (ok until 5.30). I didn’t even read. Mostly I cleaned. It was exhausting. I didn’t even get to my closets. Those require a whole week. Probably I could just borrow a Klingon Disruptor (very good for acrylics). By the time the kids came back Sunday evening, I was sated. I had enough solitary time. For now. In about 2 days the house is going to look just the same as ever and the carpet will be coated with cat hair again but I still am feeling the peace of my lovely solitary weekend.
About a year before these revelations, and after a report that an alleged agent was being paid £50,000 a year, I had spoken to an intelligence source about payments.
Hudson and I walked along the shoreline.
this week, but you will have to wait till Wednesday to see it.
Hi there and welcome to the second day of teasers from My Favorite Things! Weren't yesterday's peeks awesome? Today we have two new sets to introduce, Inspired By Trees and Two Scoops For Flopsey.
The barrel-aged Rasputin gave off aromas of mild sweet chocolate, with some yeast and vanilla notes. It was very strong, with big sweet malt flavors. The bourbon notes really began emerging in mid palate.The bourbon, chocolate, and vanilla flavors are well integrated -- but it's maybe just a touch too sweet.
Sweet Potatoes
This year, with all the travelling I've been doing, I'm on austerity measures. So courtesy of a cheapy ticket from Ryanair (I never thought I'd see the day when I'd say I'm so glad I booked with Ryanair), I am attending the conference but not the fair itself!
Nicholas caught a few fish yesterday and we had a fish fry last night. Thanks to the good ol cast iron skillet, some buttermilk and cornmeal, it was a delicious feast. Even had some left to share with the neighbors.
You probably know I am a solitaire gamer. Even though it was started out of necessity, it is something I’ve learned to enjoy very much. It’s my private playground, and probably 70% of my painted figures have only been used in solo games.
This technique of coloring the stamp with markers and then stamping on the First Edition DSP was demonstrated at the SU Retirement Party last Friday. Since the Inspired by Nature set is another one getting the old heave-ho to make room for new stamps, we used this for one of the make & takes, bidding it a fond adieu.
even if you fail to brave
Toronto has grown up. The once gangly, uncertain metropolis, always shrinking and shrugging to unfair New York comparisons, has come into its own, firmly planting its feet in the 21st Century. The Luminato Festival may be the most illustrious sign of that growth and emergence. A testament to cross-disciplinary collaboration, encompassing all creative fields, the Luminato brings together artists and creative minds from around the world, and from all cultural backgrounds, while also showcasing Canadian art and creativity to the world.
curry leaves - 3-4 torn
brief career as a state legislator devoid of legislative achievement
Strawberries (Ever-bearing varieties can be maintained as perennials in colder climates)
Jacob's bath time is awesome! We do the washing part just as soon as he gets into the tub. Like many other kids he doesn't like washing and rinsing his hair, but he LOVES to sit and play, often until the water gets cold! He loves the routine of putting on lotion, and now that he's stopped eating the lotion, we let him rub some on his tummy!
I am rather proud of how it turned out. I was able to see a vision of what I wanted and was able to make it work.
Exclusive to How to Act Nervous:
In the second place, it must be known that the man, whoever he is, who is going to make war against the Turk, must be sure that he has a commission from God and is doing right. He must not plunge in for the sake of revenge or have some other mad notion or reason. He must be sure of this, so that, win or lose, he may be in a state of salvation and in a godly occupation.
FREE ENTRY
The kids had a ball rolling their little cars all over the place, although some of them were a little disgusted with their wheels, since the kept falling off. The children whose cars had better wheels really lucked out, and many of them were bringing me their cars and asking for "better wheels." A bunch of them wanted me to tape the wheels on, but it took a real demonstration of why that wasn't going to work before anyone was convinced that it was a bad idea! It was actually a pretty good problem solving opportunity!
I’ve decided I LOVE the Jot Pro stylus! It’s very responsive and with the little round see through surface, I’m able to add fine detail to things.
But here’s the thing: so few of us actually revisit these stories as often as they deserve. The problem seems to be that they become such a part of our lives as Indians, so very familiar, that we never feel the need to read them again. No matter what religion you personally profess, if you grow up in this country, you know all about Rama, Sita, Ravana, Krishna, Arjuna and all the rest from the wide and colourful cast of these two epics. And so, you may end up thinking that there is nothing new to learn from them.
Stampers' Select White Card Stock
Selecting a kitchen design professional requires an organized process that will enable you to fairly and efficiently evaluate design professionals based on set criteria. The following tips will help make the process streamlined and smooth, paving the way (hopefully!) for an equally easy remodel.
Lovelovelove.
I am running my second 5k tomorrow morning for Cinco de Mayo, so I could probably justify eating some rice tonight, but I’m not going to. Running 3.2 miles isn’t any more cardio than I usually do and carb loading isn’t going to be necessary. I am excited to post my results and also a before/after picture in my favorite Cinco de Mayo shirt. Happy Friday all!
*There is no switching of registration codes or earning periods after registration. No exceptions.
“Down with a world in which the guarantee that will not die of starvation has been purchased with the guarantee that we will die of boredom.”
That said, back to cases of anti-logic. In a word: grit. You know, that stuff what is used to stop cars and people slippy sliding all over the place in winterland. Nah, not here. Armies of impoverished workers are employed to manually sweep snow from roads and pavements in China. Mostly indigenous people who can’t be trusted to do illogical jobs like competent till operation. Now, I’m all for boosting employment opportunities, but there’s a problem here. Snow falls (with me so far?). People walk on the snow, it compacts into ice (still there?). Things get slippy; people slippy slide and get sore botties falling over. Conspicuous by its absence, grit don’t happen (follow?). It snows again. The snow acts as grip for winter shoeses (thats’s good, right?). Kinda. At least it does until the same army of snow sweepers lift every snowflake from the city walkways. Now there’s ungritted ice on the ground for four months which, day by day, gets polished to a fine sheen by so many pairs of feet doing the Chinese winter shuffle. Duh!
There is healing in helpong others.
For those interested in developing their palates, I recommend tasting a Torrontés against aromatic wine varieties of a parallel character. Try varieties that contain the same (low) level of sweetness so that the sugar content does not interfere with the way you perceive the sweetness of the nose, the acid levels, or the texture of the wine.
"We'll see." She mouthed with a roll of her eyes, pulling her brown hair out from between her lips. She turned away from the wind and the street to make yet another phone call, and as she did, her heel caught an edge of black-ice and she fell backwards: wincing as her ass and then palms hit the ground, straining her wrist. She sat there in the moon: a long tear fell from her eye, which she wiped away, and in her other eye she blinked her tears back.
That was as close as I ever got to those who worship at the altar of The Force.
I was actually sitting in the car drinking the rest of the water when someone pulled up alongside me in a blue car.
The drug scenes are absolutely hilarious, creating comedy gold in the form of Hill and Tatum “tripping” on the same synthetic drugs that they are trying to stop. The moment where Tatum bursts through the band room doors and trips over a bell set, then eventually catapulting through a gong brings me to tears every time. Hill dancing on the track, being commended by Riggle is also comedy gold, eventually leading to the “baton penis” that, again, probably makes the female crowd shake their un-approving heads.
I will ever love and trust Him,
Dress for the weather outside and choose natural fibers for your clothing when possible. Heat and humidity can cause acne outbreaks to occur with some people. Additionally, clothing that is made from man-made fibers could cause body heat to rise and a sweat to occur, which could further worsen your acne problems. Being too hot can exacerbate acne symptoms. Make sure you wear clothes you feel comfortable in and that are appropriate to the weather.
Fools Parsley (The leaf stems are grooved, uniformly green but completely hairless.)
Frank read from his latest novel ‘Chitty Chitty Bang Bang Flies Again’ and told how the roots of the story grew from real life.
- The special effects that went into Kronos are indeed pretty amazing!
In the end, it turned out that the address on the itinerary was wrong, and we finally arrived. And into bed. This morning while Frank got organized I spent a bit of time looking around, and our hotel, it turns out, has a carp pond, frangipani trees (which I knew as plumeria in Hawaii; the scent is unmistakable, and unmistakably wonderful) and a place to get Thai massage. But we are back to the airport and on to Cambodia.
This is brilliant but they need help!
Anyway, The Hubs peeked at what I was doing and said I made a mistake in the demographics section.
This is my life
As the anniversary of probably one of the most infamous responses in broadcasting history approaches, the woman who uttered it is shortly to be awarded “the highest honour” that America bestows upon civilians: the Presidential Medal of Freedom.
You see, the problem is, we may know how to hurl a lot of drink down our necks in the Scotland, but we really have very little finesse about doing it. That night he learned, that both Rakia and salad should be savoured slowly, a little ‘sip’ here, a little ‘nibble’ there.
“Act No. 926, the first Public Land Act, was passed in pursuance of the provisions of the Philippine Bill of 1902. The law governed the disposition of lands of the public domain. It prescribed rules and regulations for the homesteading, selling and leasing of portions of the public domain of the Philippine Islands, and prescribed the terms and conditions to enable persons to perfect their titles to public lands in the Islands. It also provided for the “issuance of patents to certain native settlers upon public lands,” for the establishment of town sites and sale of lots therein, for the completion of imperfect titles, and for the cancellation or confirmation of Spanish concessions and grants in the Islands.” In short, the Public Land Act operated on the assumption that title to public lands in the Philippine Islands remained in the government; and that the government’s title to public land sprung from the Treaty of Paris and other subsequent treaties between Spain and the United States. The term “public land” referred to all lands of the public domain whose title still remained in the government and are thrown open to private appropriation and settlement, and excluded the patrimonial property of the government and the friar lands.”
Now the IGP has issued a statement that those protesters that broke the law by breaking into dataran and those showing acts of violence will be arrested
And here is my layout .......
Margaret Ruth Echtermann, 33, Hoboken, N.J.
KO: *eyebrow raised*
I used a wild cherry lip pencil to line and fill in my lips.
Stila Eyeliner in Tiger. Not sure about this. I used this on my under eye area using both of the above mentioned UD e/s. It just didn't work for me...The red in the brown came out too much and made my eyes look sickly. It's strange because when swatched on my hand, the red is not as conspicuous.
04 - All Over Now 03:49
Have a fantastic day! Make it great :)
I feel like the books and articles about RAD are all pretty clear: the #1 priority needs to be building a relationship between my child and I.
freeze the leaves of skeletal trees
Dress: fri. – Blush.Dress (Holly)
I’d be interested to hear how our readers would go about this as there was a great deal of variance in how our participants took to the task. It’s all hypothetical and not restricted by the boundaries of reality so you can have bottled or kegged, chilled or cellar temperature – the island can cope with anything. Don’t take too long to nominate your stash, and don’t let anyone second guess you. Nor should you worry too much about your decision. It’s meant to be fun.
Former Secretary of State Donald Rumsfeld in his biography perfectly shares the same feelings I once had in writing about this subject:
1. Easter. Jesus lives! And obviously less important but somewhat noteworthy for the sake of killing time....
When the numbers of immigrants surpass this threshold, it’s imminent disaster for these proud former rulers of the world with their efficient economies, exemplary political and legal systems and strong moral and religious traditions. Two disasters, to be precise: on the one hand, cultural and religious destruction (Eurabia style, those Muslims do multiply like rabbits, don’t they) and, on the other hand, economic destruction. Let’s focus on the latter shall we. (An age-old culture or religion that can’t withstand the onslaught of a few million poverty stricken and low-skilled nannies, builders and factory laborers doesn’t seem to deserve survival).
Back to ‘reality’, it is the bread-and-butter car that most of us would be most concerned, so as to speak, and if the electric-powered variant would serve as an alternative.
Now, I mentioned a little fixer upper. I can see the potential in just
And then he gets better.
They represent Tiphareth in extension within nature, the Son, the Child of the Supernal Father and the inheritance of his Kingdom below.
After the first tray of wine I was of the opinion I quite liked it so decided upon another. Which I necked with equal gusto, commentating to my conversational partners that the wines of their country were indeed very fine.
“Why is that?” I asked loudly.
On his throne of love, and grace,
However, Fletcher Pratt, famous military and naval analyst and inter-planetary researchist, says: “Knowing what we know about these three giant planets, any life form there must be completely different from ours. It would have to use a nitrogen instead of an oxygen base, with lungs and other internal apparatus designed in such a way as to extract nitrogen from the atmospheric gases.”
It's a little daunting. I'm not sure I'm entirely up to the challenge. Good thing I have all these responsible adult people (well, they gave BIRTH to the little ones) to help me.
Bolinhos de Bacalhau
chasing Demons down on white horses
Upon arriving at the doctor's appointment, it was so wonderful to be greeted by our favorite CF Nurse. It is such a blessing to have a nurse who worries about us and cares about us and allows us to give her hugs after all of the arduous work we ensued getting this appointment underway!!!
One month, I was one of the winners. I was instructed to look at the inventory of items in the chest, choose which item I wanted, and e-mail my choice to the person in charge of the treasure chest. When I looked in the virtual chest, I saw that there was a ball of Rowan Kid Silk Haze, known to many knitters as “Crack Silk Haze” because knitting with it is so addictive. I had never even seen Kid Silk Haze in person, let alone knit with it, so you can imagine my excitement. Here was my opportunity to try one of the most talked about yarns in the history of knitting without having to shell out the big bucks for it! To say I was keen to try it is a gross understatement.
As it turns out, Kenneth Branagh was sitting a couple of rows behind us. We saw Emily Mortimer in the lobby. By all appearances, they were going back to meet Baryshnikov after the play concluded. They get to do that. I did not get to do that. They are famous people, and, in this one instance, I really wished I was.
And if you think that sounds heartless, believe me, I don’t do heartless. If anything, I surprised myself (and nobody else) that my heart got so involved when I thought I was being so smart! so spiritual! so relatively detached! HA! Not even close. That I don’t come apart in segments no matter how hard I try is one of the MAJOR realities I confirmed about myself. (More on that in a later post perhaps.)
But we have it now, and we're making...er....good use of it. First thing? The girls took photos of each other with it, recorded each other and, of course, I found a few apps for them to play with during these long car days. (Why not? They sure earned some fun with all the patience they've shown these long days.)
And icy winds that roar and blow?
in the maelstroms of my blood.
This EDF Energy advert is truly wonderful. It’s been on tv for a couple of days now. That little orange blob is called a Beatbot/MyKeepon, or “Zingy” as I found out from YouTube comments, and they dance along to the sound of the music played. But I haven’t been able to find the exact one used in this advert…yet. I have found a yellow version that’s for £40 though.
* Using your personal power to achieve goals
So instead of feeling sad about being apart, I’ll just say I’m thinking of you,
I'll post more figures like this soon~
Manchester City
Nowadays hats aren’t an important piece of our wearing apparel—unless you count baseball caps. However, in the late 19th to early 20th centuries, ‘real’ hats were a part of everyday attire. Yesterday’s hats were considered a necessity for a complete wardrobe. Men sported bowlers, boaters, and fedoras which varied through the years only slightly from crown to brim. Women’s headwear changed greatly with bonnets, bucket, cloches, turbans, and pill boxes, each designed to match fashions, colors, and lifestyles. Hats as accessories began to diminish in importance during the mid-20th century, and I wonder if they’ll ever make a real comeback. Personally, I have my doubts, but I never thought bell bottom pants would come back in style, either. So hang onto your hat if you have one! Remember that Girl Scout motto and be prepared!
According to the linked Forbes article , the idea of seeking to be 'taken seriously by broad audiences' on the issue of race should be paramount. Apparently honesty is to be subordinated to courting 'broad audiences.'
Jerusalem Maiden is a sensitive and poignant novel about Esther Kaminsky, an Ultra-Orthodox woman who lives in Jerusalem. Her lifelong conflict between her expected role and her desire to fulfill her artistic passion is arduous and painful. Her future is God’s will, a script that leaves no room for improvisation. She is expected to marry, produce sons with the hope that she will deliver the Messiah. One day, her French teacher notices her sketches have promise. From then on she secretly takes art lessons as her religious dogma wavers. The stage is now set for an enormous fissure of faith that will become a defining struggle for Esther.
In the end, he was transported home, as was his wish. He wished only to die in the comfort of his own home, surrounded by his family. We all gathered and waited, slowly saying I Love you and Goodbye, one person at a time in their own fashion.
Otherwise, it's a waste of money.
Rruga annotator Steve Lake (yes, an ECM album with notes!) likens this particular track to a cross between Scott La Faro’s “Jade Warrior” and Annette Peacock’s “Mr. Joy” (best known in its interpretation by Paul Bley). But my guess is that Brad Mehldau and The Bad Plus are much more relevant points of inspiration and motivation for the Vallon trio than the old-schoolers – many of whom have made their mark on ECM – that made this sort of trioism possible today.
I was sad to leave, but if I stayed and visited more booths my brother would have had to roll me out of there. It was a wonderful day and spending time with my brother, nephews and niece made it perfect.
whaps me 10 times
Since I haven't paid any attention lately to what is going on in San Francisco, I would have missed this opportunity altogether if my friend "Lorica" hadn't invited me to go just before the show closed.
· They believe they will attain perfection on earth
Hollyoaks: Karen Hassan (Lynsey Nolan)
Finally, on Friday afternoon, the big moment finally came! We all got to play with our cars!!!!!! I turned the kids loose with their cars and let them roll them all over the room. A few of the kids were saying things like, "Uh... how is this a car? There are only two wheels!!!" I just said, "Well, it's an EARTH DAY car! You only NEED two wheels, so that's all you have!"
GREYING GHOST PRESS #48
1 coagulum
Mr. Optimist remembered another one alongside the bus station.
These are the rules of the Lucky 7 game:
Lady Eleanor Ramsay is the only one who knows the truth about Hart Mackenzie. Once his fiancee, she is the sole woman to whom he could ever pour out his heart.
Mon, 2:30pm: Relief. It stayed in.
"We do not inherit the earth from our ancestors, we borrow it from our children." -Native American Proverb
Total cost.....Ten items for $42!
had so much love for me
And then Shu and Gai fight! And it’s fucking terrible. It’s worthy of fucking Dragonball Z or something.
Gunderson-Warner S, Martinez LP, Martinez IP, Carey JC, Kochenour NK, Emery MG Clinical review of articles regarding pregnancy exposures in popular magazines. Teratology 1990; 42: 469-472.
Best On-Screen Female: Winner – YSTV (Emma Bennett)/ Highly Commended – XTV (Lindsey Harris)
And we continue into the Dark…
Of course there was a third option. He could refuse and leave the aliens to pick an alternate candidate. Any sane person would have chosen the option. That way the buck would be passed to someone more capable. Maybe a world leader, a scientist or an army general would have been a more suitable representative of the human race. But then he was a Sikh. And it was mid night. So backing out from a challenge was out of question. So Harvinder Kuldeep Singh, who was finding academic pressure too hot to handle, now had the burden of the entire world on his broad shoulders! The unlikeliest of champions!
On the term place he preferred it to the English Square as it was not necessarily regular
As some may know, I came across Jony Ive of Apple a while back and was immediately smitten.
backup at the Sagamore Bridge.
These paper jams are where I get hung up by particular thoughts.
Today is the anniversary of my cousin's toddler son dying of cancer.
5. I've never been kissed.
We can identify three major arenas in which the fencer operates – a long term (everything beyond the bout), the bout, and the action or technique level. Each level’s characteristics call for a different approach, approaches that can be defined by three key terms – strategy, tactics, and actions.
I felt embarrassed by the silence and sorry for the well-intentioned manager, and almost spoke up myself. I was going to say I was just thankful to have a job in these difficult times, then realized it might prompt him to wonder “why is he still working here?” and decided to hold my tongue. When it became apparent that no one else was going to speak — unless we wanted to ask the people ringing our phones off the hook while the receptionist was away microwaving the green bean casserole — he moved on.
The story is about Allie, a girl having to come to terms with the death of her boyfriend Trip. She was in the car the night he died and she has multiple injuries and no memory of what happened. Everyone wants to know what happened and some are even pointing fingers at her the girl who didn’t deserve the most popular guy in school. What they don’t know is that Allie has secrets and she wants nothing more than to keep those secrets hidden because she is not sure that her little town is ready for who Trip really was behind closed doors.
This unidentified woman from Milwaukee is wearing a hat like I have never seen before. It appears to be made of fabric with artificial leaves and jewelry added for decoration. I am not exactly sure how to date this photo but I do know it was most likely taken between 1893 and 1920. I suspect the date to be around 1900 - 1905. She has quite a sassy smile as well.
I am looking forward to checking out all your gorgeous designs using this fab sketch. Hop over and check out my super talented teamies gorgeous designs, ooh! they are sooooo gorgeous.
and at one point,
brought you into this world.
I hope you've enjoyed this tutorial and my time here in the Limelight. I have had a wonderful time and great experience and I appreciate every wonderful comment that I have received! Thank you so much for visiting me here! Have a wonderful weekend!
I know,
*Feathers
Danni dice:
These websites are extremely helpful to guests especially if you are having a destination wedding. You can post all of the information on there from the story of how you guys met to all the events that are happening on your wedding week and wedding day. You can also use the site to track your online RSVPs, assign seats and tables at the reception, as well as track all of your wedding gifts as they arrive. It's an amazing tool and will definitely get you very organized.
kArya is this manifestation of the world, kAraNa is that pure akSara (unmanifest param brahma).
Draw in outsiders. Appeal to people who have never heard of your non-profit. Share interesting facts and content about your organization to create a buzz.
Today is a new day! So let’s stand up and take charge of our lives and let’s give the praise to our Lord!
I also used eyelets, but didn't have good eyelets and struggled with them so I won't use them again unless I can find larger ones.
Asahi Breweries Ltd Asahi Black (Kuronama)
They determined that, if Alabama asks, they’ll have to broach the subject with their university president and others “to find out what flexibility we may or may not have,” Curry said.
Though I lost a bunch of favorites that I included last time, I think this is a more coherent group of films aesthetically, historically, and thematically. It allows us a lot more deliberate time talking about methods of storytelling, effects of genre, etc. I also decided I wanted to challenge the students' knowledge and assumptions about what cinema was, is, and can be. I fear they'll find a lot of it boring, but hopefully I'll be able to show them what to look for to find at least some engagement in each movie.
When your potatoes are mashed add to the flaked salmon, and mix thoroughly.
Athletes are not the only ones put on display during the Olympic Games. The host cities responsible for hosting the games perhaps receive more intense media attention over the course of three weeks, the duration of the games, than they would normally over a period of several months. That’s because almost the entire world is literally watching. According to Nielsen, 4.7 billion people tuned in to watch some portion of television coverage of the last Summer Olympics in Beijing.
Joe decides to take his boss Phil to play 9 holes on their lunch. While both men are playing excellent they are often held up by two women in front of them moving at a very slow pace. Joe offers to talk to the women and see if they can speed it up a bit. He gets about 3/4ths of the way stops and jogs back. His boss asks what the problem is.
She lifts me in again. She doesn’t give up, does she? The young woman gets in the car as well.
Arguably the most damaging spy in US history, Hanssen repeatedly volunteered his services to Moscow’s intelligence services, cloaking his activities in a fictitious persona (Ramon Garcia) and adamantly refusing to reveal to his handlers the identity of his genuine employer. By all accounts, Hanssen was arrogantly confident in his ability to “play the spy game” according to the rules he created and employed. He gambled that he could deceive the FBI and the Russians and avoid being compromised by any US agent that might have penetrated Moscow’s services.
Awaken yourself to the possibility of transformation with all your relationships. There is always room for deeper levels of intimacy, authenticity and love. Make today count and tell your loved ones just how much they mean to you. Bless them and yourself; I promise, you will be glad you did.
I’m a full-time writer living in the Scottish Highlands – I always wanted to be a writer and have always written, since I was a child, but it took me a long time to get around to a serious attempt at a career. I was an expat in Barbados for 12 years, and started writing short stories professionally then, but I couldn’t settle to a novel. Oh, except for a couple of genre romances, but I was terrible at them: they’re incredibly hard to write. I found YA novels almost by accident – buying books for my own children, I kept being distracted by the teen shelves. And also, after my children were born I came back to Scotland, and somehow I found it much easier to write. I was back with my muse, I think.
And her first (and only) cut (measuring about 10" long) - covered in patches - her dad was driving truck then, and she had to have Mickey and Minnie ....
I bought this book when it first came out (some time at the beginning of the year). A group of my Facebook friends were going to take the class that was offered via Oprah I believe, and I was going to do it with them. Ya. I bought the book, but I never made it to the classes, and I didn’t read the book until now. And as with everything else in life, there is a timing for everything and I truly believe I needed to have a few more experiences before reading the book. It is perfect for right now! Exactly what I need at the exactly the right time.
The above dialogues are completely Imaginary 2.0 and has nothing to do with any real life character 2.0.
Our message to Lake and the EDL 'leaders' is STOP GIVING British youth the wrong message. You are NOT teaching them patriotism, only feeding a blind hatred. Your open opposition to the NF and the burning of Nationalist flags whilst waving the Star of David says it all!
It is hard to describe how well Shahrukh plays his part in this movie. He is Rizwan, he has Asperger’s, he walks/talks/thinks differently. It is an amazing transformation, yet done with such love and respect for the character. Kajol is also at the top of her form here. Her beauty, playfulness, and steely interior are remarkable. Their two performances, their incredible chemistry, the beautiful music, and the moving story make this a must-see film.
Jim Stafford – “Spiders and Snakes” (MGM)
Good Job Princess Nomad!
There are some excellent tattoos on display not just of words but also images either taken directly from books or inspired by them. Some of them are arguably not literary tattoos but rather typographic ones but there are very few of these.
God, I love my boyfriend. It has been 7 months now, and a whole year of true friendship. He is my rock in my life.
What can a man imagine with his mind?
The best way to determine what you need to pack is by using the animal preparation worksheet. Water is usually 1 ounce per pound of weight per day. The typical 16.9 fl oz water bottle will be enough water for 16 lb dog. If your experiencing high heat, remember your dog will need more water than normal. The amount of food that is needed is based on the dog.
Snowman – Hyena
All the recipes in the book use a sugar substitute called Splenda but I use proper sugar instead. It works if you replace 8 tblsp Splenda with 100g sugar.
To play driftwood again.
It is possible to enjoy something and not all of the people who enjoy that same Thing (see Harold and Maude).
Booksellers solve mysteries every day.
3.) His brain. He is seriously the smartest person I know. The smartest person I've ever known. And he mostly uses his smartness for good and not evil. Although sometimes the way that scientist/engineer brain of his works, confounds me.
Why would the officer be reluctant to answer that question? Was it a fear that a long police operation might seem to have been ridiculous if there had been so many numbers and only a few names found? Perhaps one of the House of Commons Select Committees looking into this matter, or Lord Justice Levenson’s inquiry might want to ask DCS Williams.
Just this past week, my husband was walking in from work, when he came inside and said, "I love our home. Seeing the house lit up, and knowing you were inside, made me feel unbelievably happy. Our home isn't much, but it's homey and warm, it's where we belong." I know, I know, he is amazing. At the end of the day, that is all that matters.
So why the hell aren't you publishing it by yourself?
Bruce
It is precisely because of the propaganda that spews forth from the pages of the NYT every day, that such criminality is not only commonplace, it is accepted by the masses as a necessary pathology rooted in white social racial dysfunction.
02. Dialogue Pts 1 & 2 8:16
"I'll text you one last time before I'm out of range," he promised. "I miss you."
Music venues are everywhere in Philadelphia, from the ones that work with Live Nation and Ticketmaster like The Electric Factory and the Theater of the Living Arts, to the more independent venues such as The Trocadero, the newer Union Transfer, and yes even the First Unitarian Church, which has rented out their church since the mid 1990’s to R5 Productions who put on various punk and alternative shows at the church.
06.No More
Ain't done much yet, but I'm planning a comeback album.
Nightmare on Elm Street (1984): The first, the best, the mindblowing beginning of Freddy's reign. Even on blu-ray, it still comes off as creepy. And even though I've seen the 4 hour documentary and the little specials on the dvd I have, I still can't get enough of this. It will always be landmark.
15. Samba safari (02:59)
Tiny Dancer took to the line for the last jam and fifteen points later the game was over with a 231-30 score. Then there were shenanigans. With one hundred dollars being raised for some challenge for YWCA Kitchener Waterloo Marys Place, Lou ElBammo took one for the team and was the willing recipient of the whipped creme pie. The track was coated with the dredges of the pie and on piled the Derby Darlins which only added more awesomeness to a memorable night. If the Derby Darlins were going down, they certainly were going to do it with style!
Biking the Trans Canada, on my way to Sault Ste. Marie, was just what
You will not get away from ONE. This is the number God made everything to be: ONE.
It was lovely to laze about, and read my Agatha Christie novels, and be in my fella's company without having to try hard at anything. Quietness is ok, and so are late evenings talking lots about all sorts, and joint-effort-crosswords, and snuggly siestas.
Mommy Tip #2:
Finally, I wrote a short story about everybody in the world waking up and finding that their gender has flipped called “Both Sides. NOW!” That was really fun to write; I hope it is accepted into the anthology for which it was written.
Really--it's that simple. The key, however, is preparation. Knowing what I want to see and learn makes luxury shopping more relaxing and more rewarding. Sales assistants can tell I'm not clueless, and this helps it all go smoothly. The job of an SA is to give information in a genial way--that's it as far as I'm concerned--and that role is easier to fulfill if I (the customer) know what I want.
06. Grey into Red
Before we head back into the giddyness of the Summer Mini, I want to take a moment to look at something that I made a while ago using a hostess set from the main Catalogue. I made this a while ago for my mother-in-law's Mother's Day card. Here, in the UK we celebrate Mother's Day (or Mothering Sunday as it's known here!) a lot earlier than our US cousins. I made this card in time to reach her on Mothering Sunday and then didn't get to showing you.
The new breast cancer findings surprised even some experts who have remained more supportive of hormone use.
Products derived from the above, including oils from all four (soy, cotton, canola, corn), GMOs may be hidden in common processed food ingredients such as: Amino Acids, Aspartame, Ascorbic Acid, Cornstarch, Sodium Ascorbate, Vitamin C, Citric Acid, Sodium Citrate, Flavorings (“natural” and “artificial”), High Fructose Corn Syrup, Hydrolyzed Vegetable Protein, Lactic Acid, Maltodextrins, Molasses, Monosodium Glutamate, Sucrose, Textured Vegetable Protein (TVP), Xanthan Gum, Vitamins, Yeast Products.
Though the ironic truth is, in Knoxville blacks and whites together will be standing behind the Christian and Newsom families, loathing the atrocities done to these two young people, and praying for stern justice to be served.
When a woman twice my age sits to turn the heavy grinding stone (chakki) to make wheat flour, I see in her the same bravery of those mothers who endlessly sat at the grinding stone while their children were being hacked to death. The pieces were made into rosaries to put around their necks. The warm blood dripped over the same breasts that fed the young babes’ just moments ago. What was their fault? It seems quite simple; they refused to renounce their faith, but willingly overcame their attachment to the children they nurtured in the womb for nine months.
Fresh, chopped tomato (totally optional)
The sheikh and the belly-dancer each have their following but most of us doubt that they overlap all that much, though I understand the number of satellite channels devoted to belly-dancing has been almost keeping pace with the number of channels devoted to preaching. And perhaps on politics they can find some common ground. Lest I be accused of bias when it comes to Salafis versus belly-dancers, I am including both a video sermon of the sheikh's, with English subtitles, and a video of one of Lucy's performances, which doesn't require subtitles. You may watch either or both.
He poses three interesting question at the end of this post:
Finally, Physician liability for the PA and or NP lie in three theories: vicarious liability, which is when the Physician has been found negligent by means of the PA or NP’s actions, whether or not they were actually present; negligent supervision, which is where the Physician fails to adequately oversee the work of the PA or NP; and negligent hiring, which occurs when the PA or NP is hired and the Physician is aware, or has reason to know, that he or she is incompetent or unfit. If a potential employer fails to check the competence level of the PA or NP prior to hiring, the employer can also be found liable.
Life insurance is a tool that can be used to ensure that a person will have the capital to fund all of his important goals, even if he dies before acquiring sufficient resources to fund those goals himself. Essentially, life insurance is a hedge against the untimely death of the primary bread winner and the resulting shortfall of resources that may result from early death. If you are the primary income earner and you have a family, life insurance is extremely important. Furthermore, life insurance policies often help cover the costs of funerals, which in the United States has reached an average cost between $7,500 to $10,000.
EVE Foundation (Empowering Villages Everywhere) was to voice out and proved
If I had a million buck? Oh my God I´d stay in USA of course! Find a nice town in a nice State, close enough to a bigger city. If you put a gun to my head and force me to go back to South America, then Id go for Uruguay.
An apology from Obama was definitely in order, not just to prevent further violence, but as a part of doing everything reasonable and possible to try to undo a major setback in relations between the two sides. The U.S. needs to show that they are on the side of Afghans. And, fortunately, whether Obama’s apology helped, it seems that the protests are winding down.
Well, I should be getting back to work. My creative energy is flowing nicely... as I hope yours is also.
It’s a good time. Check it out.
I love using Indian tiffins to entertain and even to take camping. Tiffins are dishwasher proof, freezer proof and can even be used to cook in an over or on a stove.
This award is given to bloggers with less than 200 followers, in the hopes that it will bring many new friends/followers.
The dish I am sharing with you today is called Chicken with Bamboo Shoots in Spicy Gravy or Ayam Masak Lemak Rebung in Malay. This dish is quite simple to cook and does not take too long. Unless the chicken is old in which case the chicken has to be pressure cooked first to tenderised it. As usual the quantity of the chilly is flexible;you may reduce it.
this "random" process of pairing two images was very similar to how i came up with this image and this image... actually, the first was more of a happy accident than anything. i had both images open in photoshop, and because the branch shot was larger, it could be seen behind the "window" of the trees shot, and i really liked how they looked layered together... so i combined them just as i saw them there on my monitor. it was like it was meant to be.
I had to do some conditioning today to get back into it, I think two days a week of conditioning is good, not enough to impede progress but enough to keep me from gassing and sucking wind during my workout.
Still I remember,
Pad Thai with Prawns
desires, and motives internalized by others. For Mead, this intertwining of self
Get Sassy, Action and Smiley ready for and settled in bed
“We used to be neighbors. Hey, did you two meet already?”
We actually have a pretty enlightened system in our company, even though it seems to change every year. A manager will look at objective data on your job skills and work habits, then assemble a smattering of buzzwords like “teamwork” and “communication” and “doesn’t mind being touched” onto a template. These phrases are read aloud as you follow along in your copy, much like the Lutheran church services of my youth, except you don’t have to stand and be seated at random points. (Also, worshipping the almighty leader is optional). At the end, you’re given a piece of paper with the only information you really care about, your new hourly rate.
Do some good for yourself while you are still able…. Life is nothing but school that does not have a graduation date until you are dead…. so DONT quit…..so DONT drop out …..complete all that you need to and enjoy it …..learn it…love it..understand it…be grateful for it because alot of people im sure wish that they were in “the school of LIFE”…….. instead of “the school of DEATH”…..
Angela Bassett
I just wanted to enjoy the company of friends instead of being preoccupied with
1/2 teaspoon dried thyme
And that was something he was beginning to learn something about right now as he looked at her while she settled at a table not so far from his, so unaware of him.
At the very least, conduct surveys to find out what they would consider quality or excellence in doing business with you. You might also wish to consult some of them about your procedures and products. This reinforces their relationship with the company, and encourages future sales.
She thinks it's funny.
Explain to the customer that properly inflated air pressure in a tire is the BEST way to avoid an accident and is best for the longevity of their tires.
Stop this day…
Published: 2009
Typically I would but because I was actually in pain it just wasn’t funny to me. Understanding the pain a ginger feels from a sunburn is very difficult for uneducated people to understand so I forgave them for being so heartless. Very fun night though aside from the sunburn and my dumb friends who aren’t funny. Wish I had just put on the sunscreen during the day though to avoid the ginger jokes, the pain and the anxiety I was getting from it. Xanax would have been clutch that way I would have stopped panicking about what everyone was thinking about me. Yes I definitely learned my lesson and I will always apply sunscreen no matter what time of the day it is. Zero sunscreen = unhappy ginger and unhappy ginger = well, aren’t gingers always unhappy? ;)
Addicted to Curry 95 (48:43 — 50:19)
“And he said to all, “If anyone would come after me, let him deny himself and take up his cross daily and follow me”
Episode 1 of 4: “Time to Kill”
A patient in front of my father’s Convalescent room was calling loudly often for a nurse, so a worker comes by and says to him, “I am now going for lunch and someone else will eventually come and help you”.. wow.. and what a cold calloused, unacceptable , indifferent approach..
both girls smiled and pulled their dresses
Hello dear friends! How are you guys? Today I’m gonna talk to you about something more than Design.
Confident people dare, learn, stretch, and take on new challenges. Confidence takes you further than insecurity.
Trust me!
’til Tomorrow.
I have slowly come to appreciate this and am learning how feel the same sense of accomplishment from successfully executing a passport photo as I got from seeing Pip and Polly’s first steps. In the grand scheme of things, I think I had much more to do with the former than I did with the latter.
dani
I love this quote that my wonderful friends at The Bodymind Institute posted on their Facebook page yesterday. “Keep away from people who belittle your ambitions. Small people always do that, but the really great make you feel that YOU, TOO, can become great.” – Mark Twain
I love that there is a project that is collecting real data about bee population and the participants benefit by enjoying the beauty of the sunflower! If I don’t have hives this year, I am at least gonna have sunflowers!
Shearing’s bebop-influenced sound became identified with a quintet — piano, vibes, guitar, bass and drums — which he put together in 1949. More recently, he played mostly solo or with only a bassist. He excelled in the “locked hands” technique, in which the pianist plays parallel melodies with the two hands, creating a distinctly full sound.
It’s times like this when thinking about Buffy is bad for me. The flashbacks where Andrew actually threatened to kill Siobhan made me inadvertently laugh because in another universe, Sarah Michelle Gellar would’ve put Andrew through a wall for coming out with such a threat, wouldn’t she?
Excuse me, I have five pages. May I use the Xerox machine?
But it also occurs to me that this bloody book has got a real hold on us – we fear reprisal if the koran is burnt, and Muslims exploit this fear – which is not healthy for anyone – us in particular.
Beginning the Map
What does this mean for you right here, right now? This means that you can no longer live by the priorities and expectations of your parents, your culture, your religion, and your peers. You now have to live by YOUR priorities. Do you know what they are?
Lay on the beach today. Just loved the brief moment of chillin in God’s backgarden. The warm but not piercing April sun.
Image taken from Floor Plan Manual Housing / Page 203, Torre Blancas, Sáenz de Oiza, 1969.
In order to ingest sufficient nutriment that I seek, I need to down a lot of veggies and fruits. I can’t get that much down (many pounds) So for me, juicing is my answer. It is no problem to down a 10 12 ounce glass of delightful juice with all the flavors I love (apple, ginger root, garlic, carrots, celery, kale or collard plus dandelion greens, maybe some parsley, several times a day.
five”?
Its a full bodied and creamy wheat beer. Taste of banana and clove with some sweet malts are noted with very minor cinnamon with a yeasty and metallic finish.
The King’s English
She says I pray
To explain to you why Airavata continues to live in my imagination I should start by sharing a few of my own childhood and adult meetings with elephants… though none of the elephants I’ve come across have ever been white!
When choosing a cordless tea kettle you might think that the choice is obvious really. Pick a kettle, any kettle will do, as long it does the job of boiling water. You could do just that, or you could choose an electric kettle with some of the following features.
assembly approved a Fixed
face:
Something is about to happen now. I can feel it so close. Maybe that’s why I’m saying what I’m saying today and specifically ‘some of the things’ I’ve been saying.
Identification A huge, stocky, strongly designed finch with a very short longest tail and heavy expenses. Male: individually designed, your human is a rich older darkish, becoming dark darkish on head and dark-colored on title. Both the temple and eye brows are bright older yellow-colored. The longest tail and wings are black; the latter has distinct genuine bright secondaries and tertials. The light yellow green expenses is huge for a finch. Female: your human is gray darkish above, buffier on underparts, receiver, and rump. The neck is almost white and has a unique black malar red stripe. Like the using its, the wings are dark-colored, but the secondaries are not as genuine bright and have a black border, and a bright base to the primaries types a bright spot visible in a collapsed side. There are huge bright spots at the end of the longest tail. The side and longest tail design are obvious in trip. Juvenile: the using its looks like an mature using its, only your human is a duller consistent darkish and the eye brows are a unexciting yellow-colored. The women looks like the mature women.
“Oh no, I hurt her!” Sam yelled as he jumped to his feet. He then stood speechless, his mouth wide open.
It isn’t just my 10 year old either who’s stressed about it. His friends are worrying too. Worried they won’t ‘pass,’ you can’t fail these tests, but to achieve below your peers? Kids in his class have already rounded on each other….’you’re thick you only achieved a level 4, I got a 5!’ Labels hung around the necks (metaphorically speaking) of children who believe in the significance of these tests because they’ve been told how important they are by people they respect.
It was all great ANYWAY!!
They had even hauled these big lumbering oxen up there!
I told him we better have a plan on how to keep those Chicks alive if we lose power. Thirty seconds later – boom – no power. (The wind was fierce and I was concerned about the trees coming down, but the storm only lasted about five minutes and then all was calm. Of course the rain never stopped, this is Oregon you know :) )
The last time I remember going into a second-hand bookshop I was in Melbourne and I picked up a book of three plays by Tennessee Williams. That would have been a little over a year ago and I haven’t read it yet.
KEVIN VAN HENTENRYCK: Oh my god..You're a sick man!
Gregory Boggs, president of the African-American Firefighters and Paramedics League of Chicago, said that Friday’s decision was a victory, but that black firefighters still made up about only 18 percent of the force.
Then think about what you have been taught. Do I believe that because it is the logical argument passed down through generations, or do I believe it because the scripture actually makes this argument? Is this belief what was handed to me, or is this truth from the word of God?
This guy sure loves to dance! Frogs seem to be all legs and are excellent jumpers. I love their bulgey eyes.
WITNESS: Uh.... I was gettin' laid.
Both supple and fluid yet biting and strong
1 Introduction 1:11
If you suspect your child is bullying others, it’s important to seek help for him or her as soon as possible. Without intervention, bullying can lead to serious academic, social, emotional and legal difficulties. Talk to your child’s pediatrician, teacher, principal, school counsellor, or family physician. If the bullying continues, a comprehensive evaluation by a child and adolescent psychiatrist or other mental health professional should be arranged. The evaluation can help you and your child understand what is causing the bullying, and help you develop a plan to stop the destructive behaviour.
And dropped it in, and seen the image wallow,
Here lies the last project of 2011. For Christmas, my sister, Erin, knit a hat for my other sister, Bri. Since it was super cute and I couldn't bear to be left out, I knit myself one over the last couple of days. (BTW, Erin is knitting herself one too. It is an epidemic!)
There are oodles of blogs I look to for inspiration, which I faithfully follow through my Google Reader. But I have noticed that a number of them only inspire me for a certain amount of time and then get bored on move onto others.
Since then it is by faith that we are justified, let us grasp the fact that we have peace with God through our Lord Jesus Christ. Through him we have confidently entered into this new relationship of grace, and here we take our stand, in happy certainty of the glorious things he has for us in the future.
More than 2 million Americans suffer from the medical illness called schizophrenia. In fact, it’s twice as common as HIV/AIDS. Schizophrenia strikes people of all races and both genders, and cuts across all social and economic classes. Unfortunately though, only a third of all Americans living with this disease receive treatment. Why aren’t more people suffering from mental illness receiving the care they need and deserve? There are so many factors involved – stigma, ignorance, and of course the behemoth monster called our Health Care System. Commonly, there is an enormous delay that occurs from the time of first symptoms of schizophrenia, to receiving treatment for it. The average delay is 8.5 years! So much can happen during 8.5 years, including becoming homeless, ending up in jail, or committing suicide.
So how many women were there?
Sword pleaded guilty to third-degree sexual assault and was sentenced to a minimum of 9 years in prison.
Our girls prevail
A bunch of the old removed plumbing. And yes, the whole rest my basement is the same painted green color.
The driver replied, "Sorry, it's not really your fault. Today is my first day as a cab driver. I've been driving a funeral van for the last 25 years."
We were there to meet inventors (and Ig Nobel winners) Makoto Imai and Hideaki Goto who had travelled over from Japan to meet various people and to present an example of their Wasabi Fire Alarm to the museum. Their research into 'what smells will wake you up' led to the discovery that a potent aerosol made from the pungent Japanese horseradish will irritate the mucus membranes to such a degree that you have no choice but to wake up. The practical application of this is a fire alarm for the deaf.
And so, THANK YOU, MOTHER HEN!! If you haven't been over to see her, then do so now, you lazy buggers. You'll love the piccy of the hens on her doorstep. AND the biggest blinking pumpkin you have ever seen! No, really, a Pumpkin. Not a euphemsim for anything.
The Gambhir river is the main source of water to the Ghana Canal, the lifeline of the park. The water flowing through the Ghana Canal is then routed around the park by a system of dykes and canals via a series of sluice gates, resulting from astute water management.
Flower are from Prima Marketing
‘I made it look like auto-erotic asphyxiation, though of course it was hushed up. Hoover’s death was officially attributed to a heart attack. He had high blood pressure. There was no autopsy of course. Tolson saw to that.'
Makes around 2 dozen cookies, or more if scooping with the smaller size. The scooped dough freezes great and bakes up as yummy as the fresh dough. Add 1-2 minutes to baking for frozen dough. So good!
You can mourn or share your stories in the Comments, as well as by emailing me (reviewsbyisam@yahoo.com). And make sure to follow me on Twitter. I tweet about all of my new posts, as well as Mac and iOS news. Just head over to twitter.com/reviewsbyisam.
Erica Jong, who describes herself as a “zipless gran,” is the only one to point out that the intensive, at-home parenting required of the “attachment” model “takes resources”: “An affluent mom who doesn’t need to earn can afford co-sleeping, making pure food, using cloth diapers and being perfectly ecological,” Jong rightly observes.
According to the Guardian’s Infomania feature on film director James Cameron we now know what song was playing in the Costa Concordia restaurant when it hit the reef earlier this year. It was the theme tune from Cameron’s ‘Titanic’ movie from 1997. That’s right just as passengers were getting scared and wondering what the hell was going on they had to endure the dreadful warbling of Celine Dion as she imitated a strangled cat during what is probably one of my least favourite songs ever, “My Heart Will Go On”
the capitol of the USA and in a field in Pennsylvania ?
"Why, what's wrong?" Asked Moon.
Who doesn't deserve clean food and a clean way to make a living? It's such an interesting way to look at these issues. For some of the workers, the concern about organic is more about not wanting to feel like they are doing anything wrong.
This concept is especially useful when you are attempting to break a habit or set a goal. You can’t visualize not doing something.
After searching for hours for the photos I wanted to use and not finding them, I decided to use these photos of Pat's daughter and my dad's puppy we gave him for his birthday. They were perfect for these papers from Basic Grey. There's my wreath made from the Memory Box die!
I'm so lucky.
“As a kid, you don’t know what or who you are,” he told me. “Germany is a baby nation. Our country was just pieced together in 1871 and we don’t know who we are.
The reason for our journey though, was to visit this place. Yes, we went to see wolves. They are AWESOME. (In retrospect, I should have done a bit more dancing on the trip. Because Dancing with Wolves is so much better than DWTS. Yeah, and I haven't even had sugar this afternoon. Makes you wonder, doesn't it!) This preserve helps to save wolves all over the country. They have some that used to be pets, some that are just pups still and some veterans who are 17 or 18 years old. This pack, pictured below, is the largest of the various packs they have. They have 3 acres of land to roam on. And my goodness, they are simply beautiful creatures. I learned a lot - the preserve's focus is on education - and really enjoyed the experience.
And finally... we've got some more art on the walls.
19. Mouse On Tha Track - Swagga Fresh Freddie
You will have until next Thursday (February16) morning 6:00 AM EST to link your project.
You wake up from your afternoon nap everyday in a horrible mood. The only cure is to let you take a bath.
I suppose you could read the poem on the page. It’s a pretty bad poem, full of awkward phrases. I regret even writing it on the page now, but it’s done in paint and there’s no going back. The ending is the worst. I think I was too tired to make a coherent ending. It was written for a creative writing class, and it was sort of inspired (well now I think a lot of the page is inspired) by Jean Micheal Basquiat. http://basquiat.com/ Except Basquiat could draw crazy words everywhere and it would make sense. I just made a mess except with numbers and calculus.
She became attached to my hip especially since we moved to Jakarta. It’s normal because she’s in a new environment and have spent a lot of time with me alone as I don’t know many people who have kids of her age. I drag her everywhere when I have errands. Now I have two days with 4 hours in the morning when she’s going to be in school and it makes me feel better to do stuff that doesn’t cater to her needs and I can do that without feeling guilty.
Just get onboard
“So can faith,” he calmly responds.
Lux-Pain (DS)
The chances I’m taking
In his Shannonside Northern Sound interview yesterday, Fr Cusack said they had sent Smyth for treatment many times. They had “conferred with professionals” who had used “aversion techniques”, which were “not effective in this case”.
More than ever there is need for renewal - in our repentance for pushing God out of our lives and schedules. Especially, renewal in God's mercy that we receive together with God's people in the blessed Eucharist.
India maintains 17 consular camps inside Pakistan, near the border, adjacent to Blackwater facilities, falsely designated as CIA or USAID stations.
and I always hope to see a glimpse of the building because the apartment
So what are we to do with this Jesus? NT Wright has some helpful thoughts at this juncture:
There's a place for us, you know the movie song.
Spring is in the air! I think this is the best time of the year, it just starts to get nice outside. The plants begin to grow and the birds singing away. The temperature may go up a bit more, but that will happen in the following weeks.
– Your work is our work, our work is yours” –:
03.Masimba (Original Mix) 07:05
I only know I gotta get there
There’s a fair amount of CGI and some of the fight sequences are a trifle short for my liking, but it whistles past at an engaging, breakneck speed and the positives outweigh the negatives by quite some margin.
The first week I worked and wondered if there were any meetings that were ever conducted. All I had to do was ask which was yesterday and we had two meetings, one of which was my induction
North Korea is officially an atheist country. During the last few decades the regime has been brainwashing its citizens to buy into a philosophy-turned-religion called “Juche.” According to Juche, there is no god but Kim Il Sung, the country’s “Eternal President.” This makes North Korea the world’s only country governed by an embalmed dead body. Sung is believed to have been endowed with mystical powers to bless the country.
There is only 80 days until spring! FOR BIRDS, a combination of sleet and deep snow makes many food sources impossible to reach. In normal winter conditions, most birds have ways of coping with the cold. To help survive cold nights, Chickadees can lower their normal 108-degree body temperature by 12-15 degrees to conserve energy. By dawn, they, like many birds, will quickly dart to a food source to fill their empty stomachs. That’s why early morning and late evenings are some of the ‘largest crowds’ at bird feeders.
As part of my (slightly obsessive-compulsive) nature LOL, I also added links at the subbed video pages for:
I love the city and the country, prefer the city but the country does have its perks. The sky here is phenomenal, there are woods that I can go into and sit on a fallen tree to write, I can walk to the edge of our property and sit down to look at the cows, or go out to the old log cabin and lay in the grass. A notebook is much more transportable than a computer, especially if running through the woods. There is also a whole bunch of frogs here (I think they are frogs) and all they do, except for when it is raining for some reason, is chirp and croak. Seriously, they drown out the coyote howls at night. So I had a constant chorus around me, and could see the chickadees!
a.) at a crossroads and
modern man, evolutionary betrayer,
1. Give a shout out to the blogger who nominated you by linking back to their blog. Thanks again, Jacqueline!(Check her out she’s starting a new web show on her blog next month!)
David Tennant.
My Prayer Journal
In the same period that we shrank to 60% our previous maximum size, Continental doubled. Their once paltry list of Foreign destinations now dwarfs ours. They turned profits while we posted losses. They are hiring while we still have 1400+ pilots on the street. They have hired a far greater percentage of employees than us in recent years. They have demonstrated a management culture that, while it may not be Santa-Claus-on-a bicycle, certainly has produced an environment that is more user/employee friendly than ours ever was.
James Mitchell - baritone saxophone
Sedangkan dalam Pasal 1 Kovenan Internasional Hak-hak Sipil dan Politik dinyatakan bahwa :
I used to think that my story was a tragedy. That’s bullshit. My story is about love and our centers and what it takes to find that love. What it takes. I certainly didn’t feel that way a year ago—or even ten years ago. I lived through child physical, sexual, and emotional abuse and I was left to my own devices from the age of five on. I was also born with Bipolar Disorder and ADHD. Before the Complex PTSD set in—around my early twenties—I was a numb, fractured, unattached, empty girl, destroying myself as often as I could. Let me start from there.
not carrion -
There are a lot of reason the Rodgers and Hammerstein model is best left to history. Its insistence on perfect rhyming and scansion seems silly in the age of rock and roll. Old-school theatre music, including the music of Stephen Sondheim, is about order and control. Rock and roll is about freedom and anarchy. If every rhyme in Rent was perfect, it wouldn't quite feel right. If every line scanned perfectly, it would seem considerably less authentic. That's just not what Rent sounds like. Same with American Idiot.
Geographic Difference Subspecies south of the U. s. States-Mexico boundary split into 3 groups: american wildlife (alascensis, occidentalis, stewarti, phillipsi, zelotes, montana) are small, black, and long billed; southern wildlife (americana, nigrescens) are bigger, usually paler, and reduced billed; the Asian albescens, black with white distinguishing that differences more, expands into south Az and free airline New South the usa states. Rufous, darkish, and grey morphs in several numbers confuse recognition.
So, this weeks challenge over at Sentimental Sundays is:
We can all thank Diana Kennedy for inadvertently granting Tex-Mex its rightful place in food history. By convincing us that Tex-Mex wasn’t really Mexican food, she forced us to realize that it was something far more interesting: America’s oldest regional cuisine.Walsh makes the case in The Tex-Mex Cookbook for this “debased” Mexican as a very old and perfectly legitimate amalgam of cookery traditions from Mexico with influences from German, Native American, and even Canary Islander sources. He reminds us that San Antonio’s famous “chili queens” were selling bowls of spicy red goodness to hungry Texans around the time Vincent van Gogh killed himself and H.P Lovecraft was in diapers.
And thou shalt see those who contented are
08-Five Hundred Dollars
Is it just me or does it seem like the whole week drags until you get to the weekend? Then time seems to fly by and before you know it, Monday is here again. I wish there were a way to have five days of weekend and two days of work. That would be amazing.
How jet lag and the reality of life almost got the best of me, but the saving grace of a freezer full of home cooked meals from our loved ones literally got me through--they SO did.
I really do love living in this time and place. But if I could live somewhere/when else, I would be a pioneer in the 1800’s. I romanticize that era and I am sure that I would be appalled by how much manual work I would have to do. But I’ve always felt certain that I could be a strong pioneer woman and conquer the West.
Finish with coconut shreds and lots of it.
How in the hell does it work that I both seem much older, and way younger, than I actually am? Well, let’s break it down on the Bob’s Mental Age Timeline. We’ll start at my inner child and drive it home to Old Fart City (a town that even rivals Detroit for Worst Smelling Place To Live).
But then, I think that's really my main concern with this drink.
For example, the Wikipedia Turkey page (which was in the sample list of 1,000 terms) contains 12,536 words on that single page and the breadth of Wikipedia’s content stretches to 70 million indexed pages in Google across 10 languages!
I used to own a little library. It was a small affair by the standards of the day, no more than a dozen books in total. The books came in rich thick cardboard bindings made to look like leather, and the titles were printed in in gold coloured ink. There was a small encyclopedia, a medical handbook, a guidebook called "Romantic Britain" and a splendid patriotic volume entitled "Britain's Wonderful Fighting Forces" by Captain Ellison Hawkes R.A. which was published in the early months of 1940. Practically all of the books had been published by the Odhams Press which specialised in books and magazines for the working class.
Cecilia for Homestead Blessings
Today I found some of our photos from a real Guatemalan piñata. I say real, because what I’ve experienced in Canada seems like such a watered-down, antiseptic version of what I remember as real birthday-bash piñatas from my childhood in Guatemala.
raise your vibration. If you are looking for a new relationship, don¢t say
It's for younger readers, how young I can't say. But young enough that I couldn't really get past all the boys. A lot of the YA I read, when I actually was one, was chick-lit because I was always looking for someone to relate to. Over the years I have grown out of that, but with this a little part of my 14 year-old self came back.
Indeed, I'd argue, the extent to which contemporary political fantasies are being narratively projected onto the looming world of runaway climate change has yet to be fully analyzed. For instance, climate change will cause the European Union to disband, we read in one book cited here, leaving Britain an agriculturally self-sufficient (though under-employed) island-state of dense, pedestrian-friendly urban cores; the U.S. will close its foreign military bases en masse, bringing its troops home to concentrate on large-scale infrastructural improvements, such as urban seawalls, as the middle class moves to high-altitude safety in the Rocky Mountains where it will live much closer to nature; Africa, already suffering from political corruption and epidemic disease, will fail entirely, undergoing a horrific population crash; and China will implode, leaving the global north in control of world resources once again.
According to SMSes which were being circulated around earlier, a primary 3 boy from Griffiths Primary School was ‘lured away’ by a stranger at around 7am before he was able to enter the school compound:
5. A Mexican Story: 25 Bennies
Katy Perry lashes in OH MY are added to compliment the look.
I hope you get a chance to get inky soon, too. Pop by and link me up with your stamped creations!
First, we must find out how much each gallon weighs. We do this by taking 8.34 (the weight of one gallon of water) times the specific gravity of the bleach, which is 1.3. Then take that number divided by the total number of pounds to find your final answer.
4. Many years later, as he faced the firing squad, Colonel Aureliano Buendía was to remember that distant afternoon when his father took him to discover ice. —Gabriel García Márquez, One Hundred Years of Solitude (1967; trans. Gregory Rabassa)
At the moment, I have 23 students, and most of the crying at the AM drop-off has stopped. (Hooray!) Yesterday when we watched a part of the Singable Songs for Letters and Sounds DVD, I heard one child say, “Hey, teacher! That lady looks a lot like YOU!!!!” Amazingly, none of the other children pointed out that the lady on the screen actually IS me, LOL! Last year, a mom told me that her son said that the lady on the screen couldn't be his teacher because the one on the screen is much younger! :)
and mooning and spooning and holding hands
Yours truly was in charge of puddings and Petit Threes.
118. Out of Control: Norma Fox
Another thought, I was just reading in a book about the importance and spirituality of caring for creation. The author was saying that, "Modern men and women have lost their connection with creation. We're always insulated from it by shoe leather, cotton-polyester, glass, metal, plastic, HVAC, and screens of many kinds! ...I can't help but believe our souls are starved for the company of God's creatures."
You are it!
In order to prevent the villagers and their supporters from exercising their fundamental right to demonstrate and march to their lands, soldiers regularly use disproportional force against the unarmed protesters. The means utilized by the army to hinder demonstrations include, but are not limited to, the use of tear-gas projectiles, banned high-velocity tear-gas projectiles, rubber-coated bullets and, at times, even live ammunition. The use of banned 0.22″ munitions by snipers has also been recorded in Nabi Saleh.
- Why use a plate when a pan will do? It saves on washing up
To date, I have answered the door twice and been handed an envelope by a person on a two-wheeled vehicle which contained a correspondence from our children’s School.
On its face, this model seems to benefit employers the most, as they save money on costs associated with full-time employees. But Dacri says it could also work well for Maine’s aging population. Many retired workers have the types of specialized skills companies may need, but who don’t want to work on a full-time basis.
My email to the incorrect Steve:
I have had my eye on the tufted ones and have found a couple great tutorials. I plan on doing my own tutorial when I finally get all my supplies and put it together. Here are some of my faves:
But the epiphany that I had was that I had been trying to turn Liam into me, and that would be a doomed enterprise for sure. I finally realized that it was critical that I stop doing this. That I allow him to unfold and be himself. To learn what *he* likes and doesn't like. To support *his* explorations. This isn't Marji version 2.0.1. This is Liam, version one and only!
As Wikipedia warns:
Sorry to bug you on a weekend, but KSN News covered our adoption story yesterday and following the news, an anonymous donor challenged 1000 people to comment on my blog at: www.homeonthekansasrange.blogspot.com and they would donate $1 for every comment. So go comment now!!! It's free!! And it's a way to help!!
Are you heavily indebted to structural modes of analysis. Here again you’ll find the means for articulating the functioning of structure. And so on. Luhmann makes a number of important contributions to our understanding of structure, overcoming many of the problems that haunt structuralist and post-structuralist thought. First, he maintains the distinction between system and environment, restricting structure to system, and thereby side-stepping the imperialism of structure we tend to encounter among structuralists like Levi-Strauss. We now get an outside to structure, the insight that structure is purely system-specific, and are therefore able to account for the contingency of structure, how structure can change and evolve, how structure embodies risk, and the limits of structure. Second, Luhmann unfolds the manner in which structure is a temporal issue pertaining to how systems maintain or reproduce themselves across time (in the case of autopoietic systems, this wouldn’t hold for allopoietic systems I don’t think). In other words, because the events that constitute systems disappear as soon as they appear, the central issue for autopoietic systems is that of how subsequent events are produced allowing the system to be reproduced from moment to moment. This is the problem of structure and it can be seen that this problem is primarily a problem of entropy, of how to handle system entropy, and of how entropy can be warded off within systems.
the rubber skunks of retreads that have died
Now we have understood how Rakeback works. It’s quite important for you to uncover out how Rakeback works to ensure that you are able to search out a very best deal for you. It really is really crucial to find the very best Rakeback Offers as there’s no set normal of Rakeback amount in poker rooms.
Heather O’Rourke - (Carol Ann) Died of Intestinal Stenosis 6 yrs after Poltergeist was released. She was 12yrs old.
Be extra thankful for the extra money you'll save by taking advantage of this week's Austin supermarket deals.
Thanks to my friends, Mary Ann and Patricia, for stopping by and visiting, and bringing me goodies! Sure enjoyed your company!! It’s good to re-connect.
Optical Zoom: x 12
- For a ANOTHER chance to win become a follower of From India. With Love. - scroll to the bottom of the main page and you'll see the widget thingy. (sorry if you already follow you don't get a second entry!)
Chapter 4: Critters and Challenges
A few weeks before I left Hong Kong, I told Asta that I wanted to try and get to Stanley Market before I headed home. And because Asta is amazing she planned a trip for everyone from the lab to go to Stanley Market together. WAY more fun then my just going by myself!
Anyway, here’s the thing about the one-liner. With the right line and the right guy; it can be cute – and more importantly, it can make the woman laugh and give you a possible in. I assume that’s why so many men ask me if I have any food in there for them whenever I’m carrying some type of meal in my hand, even if it’s a bag of chips or something. You want to get the woman’s attention. I get that. But ohhhhhh, the wrong line and/or the wrong guy – and it can just go sooo wrong. And usually it does – I really can’t remember the last guy who piqued my interest with a one-liner.
You can use any kind of bread really. I prefer a baguette or a sourdough baguette for mine. You can make them bite sized or entree sized. So flexible, so easy and so delicious.
I was really expecting the Nestling to be doing a lot better by now. Damn.
It was a room of straight lines and crisp angles, vertical supports and horizontal catwalks broken only by the occasional dramatic slash of a staircase. Somehow, though, the shapes conspired together to form a spiral of such perfect natural grace that the eye was sucked along it, round and round and unmistakably upward into darkness. Rel got the sense that he saw far beyond the confines of any physical chamber; right at the edges of vision, there was a sense of pressure that might have been Realmlessness pressing in, but it was shielded in some way.
It's Not Christmas Without You by HelenKay Dimon
I now have a home, a little money, some clothes and HOPE
What is more troubling might be who is not leading in home runs with Lehigh Valley and Reading. Domonic Brown was expected to be the next great power hitter coming up through the Phillies system . In 2010 he hit 20 homers in only 93 games combined with Reading and Lehigh Valley. So far this year he is yet to go deep with the IronPigs. At Reading who would have thought Jiwan James has become the leading power guy and last night was batting out of the five hole. Once upon a time Sebastian Valle was the great power hope in the organization behind the plate. In 2010 between Lakewood, the SAL playoffs and the Mexican Pacific winter league Valle hit 26 homers. Last year he hit only five homers for Clearwater and two in Mexican winter ball. So far this year Valle has hit only one homer for Reading hitting out of the clean up spot in the order.
I start to blend my colors together using the lighter markers RV10 and YG03 over top of the darker colors. Notice that I've added a bit of YG03 to the center of the fruit. When you are blending RV10 over top of RV14 it can really wash out the color. So, you will want to take the tip of your RV10 and touch it to the tip of RV14 and then apply the RV10 to the areas where the darker colors meet the light colors. This will help the two areas blend without having the lighter marker completely remove the darker areas color.
Defeat may be victory in disguise;
In fact, a Parliamentary Standing Committee Report on Finance had questioned the legality of the collection of biometrics for creating a citizen database in December 2011. Also, the process of creation of a citizens’ database was outsourced to a third party with no means of adequate monitoring of their activities. The Union Finance Minister seems to have placed immense faith in this one-technology driven initiative to deliver many ambitious fiscal targets. But most of the UID-based delivery schemes will be pilot projects to be rolled out in a few chosen districts. It is unlikely that they will improve the efficiency and accuracy of the government’s gargantuan welfare schemes this year.
I didn't save The Atom Station for last because I thought it would be my favorite Laxness. But I enjoyed reading it very much, and liked it more than I had expected. For one thing, the title put me off (with apologies to my nuclear scientist friend, Reed). I thought that the novel might be more about communism, or socialism, than about human nature, or love. What was I thinking? Laxness always writes about human nature, and love!
Argue about something else? As you yourself say, how does this personally affect you, Deeva? Apparently Deeva believes, as all devout Muslims do, that their belief system should be beyond all questioning and scrutiny. She doesn't bother explaining why this must be so, because to wonder about anything is beyond argument is in itself heresy if not apostasy (disbelief). In Islam, the greatest crime is not murder, but skepticism and disbelief.
So, it's with great JOY that I tell you, "IT IS FINISHED!" We are Fully Funded! All we need now is to pass court and go get our boys!
Then, out of the blue, when I have other things going on, other pieces trying to be born, he sneaks back into my thoughts, he invades my dreams, he whispers to me when I'm at my desk working. "Now, finish me now!"
8All these towns with their grass-lands the children of Israel gave by the decision of the Lord to the Levites, as the Lord had given orders by Moses.
Was the price that I paid to see this view
Row 2: Knit row
On behalf of all the dwarfs of Homeward I urge Doctor Lyre and the students to get back around the common room table and sort this out.
- Common sense but if you want to do any celeb spotting, come in the hotter months. I actually really enjoyed the calm and quiet, the comfy temperatures and the non-existent crowds but whatever floats your boat, right? ... I do have to admit, it would be pretty killer to see Kate Moss on vacay ...
How do you pass the time on car rides? I talk, listen to the radio, or sing goofy songs like "there once was an old lady who swallowed a spider".
We arrived on the weekend and things were looking fantastic, the apartment was spacious and so beautifully decorated, I was in bliss and I swore this was a new, cool way travel. But come Monday morning we were awoken by loud drilling and banging resonating in our bones. Yep, The host neglected to tell us the apartment downstairs was undergoing heavy construction.
At the end of the summer I have so much water I usually have the dump them out before I store them for the winter. Friends are always asking me to make them one and I simply say: go buy the biggest trash barrel you can find with a lid (mosquito control) and you're all set. Don't waste your money on these $150 prefab things from a gardening store.
Saving the best till last. If you make your own earring wires and struggle to get them even then you don't want to miss this tip. Instructions and photos here.
To be honest, I might just end up doing my hair like Amelia Arsenic in the photo above ;o;
“I’ve hurt my back at the gym.”
Q. How you look at the vocational education and skill development sector to bridge the skill gap in India?
Where were we last night? Where? At the super killer English Dogs show!!! What a fantastic show, featuring three original members from the 1984/1987 era with a new pair of brothers on bass and other guitar. They played Forward Into Battle and To The Ends Of The Earth, and it was a totally amazing demonstration in crossover. The only song from the punk era was the encore Psycho Killer. The whole performance was a blast of megazer, an avalanche of killer 80s thrash with all the teeth and claw of all the awesome come-backs we had the chance to watch in the past years like Razor, Exciter/Beehler, Vulcain, Raven, Amebix, Onslaught... We can only hope they record these sets for a live release, Bitte schön. Don't miss them if this tour's trajectory crosses your area.
Okay, it wasn’t accidental, it was stupid and on purpose, but still. Someone dear to me was also unwittingly ‘signed-up’ for a fee-based ringtone service after completing an IQ test on Facebook.
I’m sure there will be all sorts of arguments to the contrary: Humans are sinful, we don’t make things holy, we foul things up, Moses was a sinner, only God is Holy. Yeah. Sure. Right. OK. I’m not going to win a theological argument by proposing that it was Moses, not God, who made the earth holy by his presence, by simply standing in a place where sheep likely urinated the day before. On the other hand, who is going to prove me wrong?
My wife got home late from work and was getting ready to give her a bath, when she said “I want daddy to give me a bath, I love him more than you”. I felt uncomfortable; my wife a little heartbroken. This all started a couple of weeks ago. I’m not sure if it means the balance has shifted too far, or if it’s a natural reaction to the at-home parent. But it is a difficult problem to solve. How can you advise who to love?
Coloured image in Promakers.
I'm taking a quick break from putting the bulletin together on this blustery, wow-winter-really-is-here day. (it's cold and bitter and not at all what we've become accustomed to)
I am not a Tory, but I do read and enjoy Iain Dales blog. I read the transcript of John Sopel’s interview with David Cameron on The Politics today. (See my weekly Postcard below) I was surprised at how poorly Cameron performed and was very surprised by some of the answers Cameron gave to Sopel’s very well structured and focused questions. I do appreciate that politicians work long hours and have many pressures and cannot always deliver killer speeches during interviews. Cameron, however, is putting himself forward as a prime minister in waiting and this interview with a well known interviewer on a well known politics show, in my view, does not show him at his best.
It was ironic though…she needed a real man but, she went for a mere boy. That still irked me although it’s been eight months.
“The greatest lesson in life is to know that even fools are right sometimes.”
I threw another sew crazy birthday party this month.
I just wanted to make a quick post about my goodbye.
The best nature photographs, most of the time, are from remote areas. Mary and I have found that it takes about a $1500 a week to keep us on the road, so even if we have poor weather or unspectacular weather, we still have out of pocket costs while we are travelling. This does not include air travel and the additional costs of having a guide or attending a workshop.
Where I witness myself
Last night, I assembled a wooden glider all by myself. Do you know how difficult that really can be? The hardware parts that were included did not match the pictures or counts in the instructions. I phoned the customer service hotline and put the goofy thing together while I listened to the recording on speakerphone : “All of our agents are currently assisting other customers.” Once I figured out where the different bolts were intended to go, I just hung up. Ha! Turns out, I didn’t need any help. :)
Day 3, Oct 26. Multicolored tweed jacket, don't remember. Lime green cami, Deep by Los Angeles. Brown suede skirt with cutouts, Mossimo for Target. Brown boots, Nine West. (Hidden necklace is very cute and I'm sorry it slid to the side when I was setting up the photo!)
But here's a new rule. If you go from being just fine to weak as hell, coughing with no mucus, suddenly freezing cold, your heart is about to burst out of your chest, and then a monster fever, just lay off the beer for a good 5 days.
"All right, folks, I have thought about it, I've given this considerable thought. I've given this more thought in the last ten minutes than most people think about anything in their life. And I am ready to change my mind on bulldozing Flint. I say go for it. Let's just bulldoze it," Limbaugh said in a transcript on his Web site.
The signs are not terribly encouraging. The Central Bank governor, Riad Salameh, cut short an interview when asked about the aftermath of the American action, calling it an “old story.” As for those nearly 200 suspect accounts, Mr. Salameh would only say that he does not involve himself in such commercial questions.
I like the personalized coloring pictures and Color My Name’s simple drawings are perfect for little fingers. I like the charm of Color My Name and I look forward to seeing the addition of more coloring pages and customization.
I am watching him sitting in front of the tv chatting to Thomas the Tank Engine and I feel so proud to have him in my life. He came about in such a convoluted way but he is mine and I wouldn’t change what happened for the world.
I have some delicious recipes to share! Inspired by what I hope is the legitimate and unfaltering arrival of warmer weather, I made a tasty summery meal. A light, fluffy quiche and a lemony carrot salad. They were easy to prepare (aside from the carrot grating) and easy to enjoy. First off… the quiche.
One fun recipe that I found is cream cheese play dough. I would have never thought of it on my own but with the help of this website we have found our activity for Saturday afternoon this weekend. Here are the instructions for Cream Cheese Play Dough:
Sadly, this means that during the month of December we spend even less time on ourselves than usual, sporting the I-just-rolled-out-of-bed-and-really-don’t-care-what-I-look-like look, feeling tired and crumby, and letting our stress and crankiness get the best of us. Not good.
Peg lays GIANT eggs. Most of which have 2 yolks. There are hers from the last two days. The one on the right is as big as my palm!
I genuinely thought someone was having a laugh when I heard that CAMRA’s AGM had accepted a motion “recognising” that “craft beer is beer with a distinctive flavour brewed by artisans”.
eliminating the toxic substances generated by its normal functioning and imposed on it by an unnatural lifestyle. In retrospect,
Some reports said the unidentified attackers were local people, angry at the disruption caused by the sit-in, which began on Saturday.
We started with badge presentation; instead of handing out badges as they are earned, as we normally do, we saved them all up to the end of the term and had a presentation instead: nothing too fancy, we had a bag for each girl and in there was a Christmas cracker, some sweeties, next term's diary and newsletter and then whatever badges they had earned.
Slowly filling with people.
Not everyone is blessed with that, and I’m well aware of this truth. Neither words nor tears can possibly express the gratitude and surprise I felt after being sent this 2.5 minute video on Logan’s birthday.
3- Enormous wastes of Ian McShane as Blackbeard and Geoffrey Rush. I’m not saying that these guys deserve meatier material, but seriously. McShane played the greatest anti-hero in the history of television. I think he can handle a little more substance. Geoffrey Rush has a fucking OSCAR. He already played Barbossa to perfection a few times. Why was this one so stale?
4) Chicago Bulls (29-8) @ Philadelphia 76ers (21-15), Sunday/6 pm/ESPN
I've been writing a lot lately, working on my story, my memoir, my book. But I needed a break from prose and wrote this farewell to spring poem. Enjoy.
Uh, I uh…He’s dead? Oh god…I have to go…I can’t breathe right now. I have to go. I love you Grandma. I’ll call later. I have to go now.
I was hoping to get some more sewing in that weekend, but puppies kept me hopping and each lunch break and night this week has had something planned. So no sewing for me.
In other words, I've got shit to lose. Even if I have a stupid impulse (and these are more and more rare as I age), it only takes me a moment to consider the negative consequences of acting on it. Impulse purged.
Has anyone been to one of their local paint studious where they show you how to paint? Well, we went for the first time this weekend - to the paint studio, laughed at each others paintings, listened to old school music, ate good food and were merry. We painted free hand and I'm no artist...drawing is not my calling, but it sure was a lot of fun. What a ball we had! Then, at church was our annual women's day program...all about celebrating the women, praising God, drawing closer to Him and learning more about His love for us. It was an awesome weekend...about the girls, chicks and the women. I hope you had a weekend as awsome as ours! :o)
According to tradition, George was a Roman soldier and priest in the Guard of Diocletian, who is venerated as a Christian martyr. He refused to sacrifice to the pagan gods and Diocletian, much against his will, was forced to order George’s execution. He is immortalized in the tale of Saint George and the Dragon and is one of the Fourteen Holy Helpers.
Their response was more than I expected. Every person in the room applauding, cheering for me. Even the stranger in the corner claps his hands, a glint of a smile on his face. My uncle remains silent, glaring at me with as much anger he can muster. His face reddens with the strain to keep control. I step down from the platform. Those who knew my parents well are the first to shake my hand and congratulate me. My mind is elsewhere, far from here. The only thing I want now is to deal with my uncle.
The long answer is, Malaysians are fed up with the deception and misappropriation of funds.
Naturally, she attempted to defend herself. But this only poured petrol on the flames, and she was denounced, by strangers, as a terrible mother who clearly didn’t want the best for her new born if she was willing to…whisper….formula feed…..
Now that I have done my part it's your turn ;) LOL
One of the things I find interesting about the book world is the fact that there are books for every sort of taste and temperament. There are books that others connect to that I don't like and books I like that other readers do not. This book falls into that category. For example, one of my favorite bloggers, Charlotte at Charlotte's Library didn't particularly like this book, but I find myself unable to stop thinking about it, something that only occurs with books I connect with in a strong way.
1.FUGAZI "Blueprint"
The role of language provides an example of how immigration allows native workers to move to higher skilled or more specialized positions:
While it remains to be seen if there’s any weight to this step, that it has been taken in first place and amid growing crisis that is being witnessed in Baluchistan over past few years, a nation that has still not fully recovered from the wound of 1971 separation is sensing another storm in the making that could lead to a further division.
(**P.S. This giveaway is open to anyone, anywhere, so don't be shy!**)
This past week I faced death multiple times. I was nearly electrocuted, almost shot, and I ate at Hardee’s. Now you may i’m kidding but I really did cheat death. (To clarify my father-in-law well he was in each of those equations but he did almost shoot me while trying to shoot a squirrel.)
3) A Paperback book of Hush, Hush by Becca Fitzpatrick
Smashwords
That’s worth keeping in my never-ending jar of unforgettables.
I happily call myself an asshole. It takes less time and requires less explanation than “I’m just not very evolved yet”. And it’s a swear, and I think swearing is funny.
The choice of contacting you aroused from the geographical nature of where you live particularly due to the sensitivity of the transaction and the confidentiality herein. Now our company has been waiting for any of the relatives to come-up for the claim of the inheritance fund but unfortunately all efforts has being void. I personally have been unsuccessful in locating neither the relatives nor any next of kin to Mr. Saba. On this regards, I seek your consent to present you as the next of kin / will beneficiary to the deceased so that the proceeds of this account valued at Eighty Five Million Dollars($85M) can be paid to you.
When I went to my computer to turn it on, I noticed that the battery light was blinking orange and white. This has happened once or twice before when the computer accidentally overheated, and I gave it not much thought. The Google search yielded quickly, and I found that my sim card was damaged, and that was the cause for my phone’s erratic behaviour. This is easily fixed… just get a new sim. Although getting a new sim is a long, laborious process mired in red tape, and all the credit has to go to those moron terrorists who thought this was a good loophole to exploit. But I dither.
Diners and bars were a frequent pit-stop for my friends and I while we were on the road for a quick meal. Not only did we find great food along the way but also saw so many awesome interiors and furnishings, I was continuously fascinated by the cool stylings of bar counters and stools in these establishments.
He truly loves his son Roscoe, who is figuring out his sexual identity. Marty handles this well and I don’t doubt his love for his son.
The spirit has its seasons, too — spring for rebirth, summer for exploration and growth, autumn for harvesting, and winter for introspection.
Did you know that you can create unique barcodes for products and brands? The above designs are just a small sample of the work from the Japanese design team Design Barcode.
Anyway, this cut is also quite tough so I thought it would be good for the experiment.
I began to worry- you always take a chance when contacting an author, I wanted to badly for them to hear from her too.
I see shock and recognition in his expression.
Here I always think back to the character of Ann Clayborn in Kim Stanley Robinson’s sublime Mars Trilogy. In those novels Clayborn is a sort of ultra-environmentalist whose zeal for preserving Mars in its original, pre-human state borders on the nihilistic insofar as she attributes a higher dignity to the rocks, dust, and environment of Mars than to the flourishing of humans on the planet Mars. She is, for example, crushed by the terraforming of Mars that involves unleashing aquifers across the surface of the planet, heating up the atmosphere, planting plants and releasing organisms, etc. Clayborn attributes dignity and rights to the planet itself, refusing to treat the planet as a mere passive matter to be formed in whatever way humans might like. While I don’t think we wish to go as far as Clayborn, her character nonetheless raises an important point. To what degree to nonhuman actants have dignity and rights all their own? And if they do, from whence does this dignity and these rights to persist in their conatus arise? Are they simply projections we make upon nonhuman actants? Or is there a more robust and ontological sense in which they have rights and must be included in our deliberations about how we relate to the world? The uncanny question that emerges when you watch Gasland is the question of what gives us the right, what entitles us to destroy these streams, these ancient rock formations, these fields, these migratory patterns, and so on. You find yourself– or rather I found myself –filled with the sense that we do something deeply wrong when we destroy these things in this way, or when we grant no “voice”, no place in our deliberations, to these nonhuman actors. And in wondering this, it seems that I’m attributing a dignity to these things that isn’t merely a matter of my projections, my cognitions, but which belongs to these things themselves. How could such a curious thing be possible?
Summoned to the scene of a murder, the police, until otherwise established, were quite right to assume, initially, that Stephen Lawrence could have been killed as a result of a fight with Brooks. Had the police automatically assumed that whites had killed Lawrence, they would have been guilty of the very thing of which they have subsequently been accused: institutional racism (directed against whites). The police are obliged to investigate all possibilities eliminating some as the data and evidence accumulate and certain positive lines of enquiry become clear. Macpherson, in his insistence that the police should have accepted Brooks’s version, at face value, of how Stephen Lawrence was killed, is, in effect, trying to undermine a basic procedure of a murder investigation.
The first night back, it was too late and I was too tired to figure anything out. So I just rocked him to sleep and put him in his crib as usually. He slept through the night, woke up and started playing in his crib. So I got up and went to wash up, leaving the monitor with Londo.
To choose a colour only, click on the 'Background' option, then select a colour theme from the right.
3. When the zucchini and shredded beets are thoroughly cooked and completely softened, add all of the beans, the tomatoes and the chili seasoning.
Track 5 recorded at Palais des Glaces, Paris on October 8, 1977.
There are lots of theories for why people feel so miserable. No doubt a big reason is that those who are lucky to have survived layoffs are left doing the jobs of several workers.
Anyway…getting back to my story: We decided to leave town on the Thursday evening prior to the (Saturday) Leadville event. Sophia and I left town in our car at 7 p.m., while Shelley and Derek left town in theirs, a little later. Shelley and Derek were going to be crewing for Andy Henshaw (with Andy’s mom, brother and friends), and Sophia and I were going to crew for and pace for Greg Burger, along with his girlfriend (Kristin) and Kristin’s daughter, Bailey. Danny Miller and his girlfriend (Erin) and Erin's son, were also going to be supporting Greg. Danny wanted to pace Greg from Fish Hatchery, all the way back to the finish line. Yes, it takes a Pillage.
Some cultures even claim that our Hollywood is so advanced that we can fake war atrocities to gather evidence for war. So, surely a fake Travolta is quite plausible. After all, there was a period of many years when he disappeared entirely from public view, and then, thanks to Quentin Tarantino, he became relevant again.
"Inspectors will spend even more time in the classroom observing teaching and learning, with a renewed emphasis on reading and literacy skills."
I'm extremely excited to share something I read on my friend Erika's blog today.
“Here’s an idea, why don’t we stay for lunch and I can go in now, “ I said in a voice that was just too sickly-sweet as a fluttering eye-lash skimmed my eye-ball.
But sometimes what looks so neat and orderly on paper is anything but, and the hours and days that go by with a list uncompleted is like a load of bricks on my mind. Sometimes it’s because the task is reliant on some external factor for completion or perhaps it’s more complicated or tedious than it first appeared to be. Or sometimes it’s simply because I spend hours and days trying to avoid it.
furry buds afterwards. the downside: i have to plant it outside in the spring so it won't get to stay in my entrance forever. it's probably better that way, it will most definitely have a longer life.
This week, along with the start of the Holiday Whirlwind, which has, in fact, included gingerbread houses, I had a wonderful visit from Rebecca Sullivan of Ember, and her boyfriend Paul. It's one of the virtues of living in New York, that even if you met someone more than five years ago, and hardly remember what they look like, they come visit you eventually. As long as they don't rip the sinks off the wall, or smoke indoors, they're welcome.
For we are the people of England, that never have spoken yet.
Moon looked at the overweight but still very glamorous Lassie. How fast could she go? Could she even turn in a circle....unless it was made out of chicken wings? Maybe he should look elsewhere? Black Pudding would be here soon and perhaps he could find another dog in the next few minutes? Moon didn't think himself to be elitist...or weightest....BUT HE WAS RUNNING OUT OF TIME!!!
You Either Beg or You may Borrow
A USA city.
So - here we are - at the end of another sometimes great and sometimes not so great year! And this will be my last blog post of 2011! I want to thank everyone who has followed me, read and commented on my thoughts and ruminations - and occasional ranty bits - and also to say how much I have enjoyed my first year of blogging. Reading all the other blogs I suscribe to has been an education and I can now state I am officially hooked on blogging! I hope my followers will continue to read my musings in 2012 as I develop my blog further...
Chris Smith (England) – Between the Toes of the Cloven Hoof
“There was a lot more than affection on display,” Chris laughed.
We boarded and were happy to find that we had a set of three seats to ourselves. After a first round of airplane food, we read, listened to music, I did a minimal amount of knitting, we talked...the usual airplane time passing tricks. And we tried, pretty much unsuccessfully, to sleep. This was abnormal for me. I've been known to fall asleep before take off.
Now here's what I realized I needed to do and have upon pulling out the recipe and beginning to read it for the first time:
"I'm ok Mum." Her legs were weak and her knees were trembling with the effort. She leaned her arms onto the car roof and tried to breathe deep and slow. "Just. Need. To get my. Breath." Her mother came round the car and put an arm round her.
Brace yourselves! The midterm summer exams are coming!
My good friends Kevin and Lori live in Ireland in an enchanted spot called Mermaid Isle. When I told him I was missing Ireland, this is what Kevin wrote to me and shared on Mermaid Isle's Facebook page:
Add in some chopped button mushrooms and stir for a couple of minutes. Add in half a bottle of dry white wine and another equal amount of beef stock. You can use chicken stock too, but for beef stew, the beef stock is more flavorsome and appropriate.
And with that, I’m going to try and get out of here without doing something else ridiculous.
I honestly believe that he spent those years as a self-proclaimed political activist without ever realising that hardly anyone took him seriously and that those whom he regarded as his friends and supporters were actually taking the piss out of him. For Brendan’s social skills were as non-existent as ever. He stumbled around college like a clumsy crow, dressed usually in a baggy anorak and ill-fitting, often dirty clothes. His sense of personal hygiene was somewhat underdeveloped, which meant that he often smelled … ripe.
Your friendship means a great deal to me. As we visit each other, share our domestic lives and our dreams, we discover mutual concerns and ideals. This way, a whole group of global friends is formed, stretching across all continents. We stretch our arms and aknowledge our common aspiration for a better world.
I hope to post more this year. Forgive me if I don't. I do have a lot of things I want to talk about in the nail polish and make up world. I love color,and makeup and nail polish is just one way for me to express myself. Until next time...take care and stay safe.....Velvet.
Often law firms hire experienced document reviewers to study the legal papers. Sometimes contract attorneys are also hired for this process. Often much of this work is done electronically, through scanned copies, emails, and other files.
Fits Epson Artisan 710, 810
There are other reasons, but we won't bore you with the technicalities. We are grateful for the service provided over the years, and we'll still use some of the facilities. But, from now on, we have a new home.
What I'd like to see is some attempt to quantify how much less driving people would do with the project in place than without it. Of course, you'd also have to take into account competing road projects that are being funded at the same time.
learning quickly
My argument is this is an early first draft for a full length play that like many another author’s first work, the author writes in imitation or or inhabiting what she loves. She just never went back to it because it was only partly hers and the motive for writing therefore too much a social occasion, not an inner need.
Gere
Sometime I read an article about the menstruation cycle with the magical 28 number. Though a healthy cycle can be between 21 and 35 days, nevertheless, somehow, the articles about periods suggest to have 28 days, which considered to be "perfect". It is not all the same to say: "the typical cycle is 28 days length, but the range in length can be between 21-35 days" or "normal cycle is 21-35 days length, the average is 28 days". According to the first one I am not typical if I have a non-28-days-length-cycle, that prompts I am "bad" one, meanwhile the second one tells I am "good". I had dropped into this trap.
Yeah, I'm mixing in some vintage Taiwanese pop into my listening explorations these days; it's been a while. Feng Fei Fei was apparently hot stuff back in the '70s and '80s, known as much for her fashion sense—her hats, especially—as for her songs and voice. She's also my mother's favorite Taiwanese singer—which is why, when she informed me recently that she had passed away in January, I raided her CD collection during a weekend back in East Brunswick, N.J., and found a few digitally remastered CDs of some of her albums. So I've been listening to some of them here and there. I can't say she's replacing the glorious (and still living) 蔡琴 (Tsai Chin) in my affections any time soon—for one thing, Tsai Chin has a sultry alto voice, and it seems I have a thing for singers with deep alto voices (see: Anita Mui)—but Feng certainly has pipes and some lovely tunes to her credit. She also likes to sing about springtime a lot, based on the four albums of material I've heard. Well hey, it's springtime now. Works for me.
With mobile users, text is much more influential than video, so remember that before growing your marketing strategy. Well over 88% of all mobile users offer text messages, only around 41% of those spend some time to watch videos on their cellular phones. This obviously means text ought to be your bigger area of focus.
I was somewhat relieved to see someone I know behind the wheel: the son of my high school track coach.
Sunshine DVD/Independent Lens Review
Spiritual-But-Not-Disciplined (SBND)
Story: This male was born to a remarkable female, Argyle Jnr, who amazingly raised all three of her cubs born in 2008 to independence. The Vyeboom Dam male is a relatively nervous young male, and didn’t follow in his sister’s relaxed footsteps. Just before he reached independence, we would regularly find this leopard in the rocky area of the Nhlaralumi riverbed north of Vyeboom Dam, but he would seldom tolerate a close approach, and moved off quickly if the vehicles drove to near. However, a patient approach would reward us with good sightings of this male, especially at night when one could get within a few meters of the leopard without disturbing him. After Argyle Dam filled up at the end of 2009, this male moved his activity further eastwards towards this dam and Motswari camp, and is often seen around the stretch of the Sohebele riverbed in this area. With the increase in sightings, he is slowly becoming more habituated to the vehicles, and positive steps have been made, especially on the occasions when he has managed to make large kills in close proximity to the camp. One impala kill of his lasted 6 days, and by the end of this sighting, he would not even open his eyes as the vehicles drove in and out of the sighting. We hope that this has laid a good foundation that can be worked on to develop another relaxed male leopard in the reserve. Sadly though, there is probably not a lot of time left for him in the area, because as he reaches maturity, his father will force him out and he will need to seek a territory of his own. The lack of males to the south and east of his current area might be potential future homes for this young male leopard.
Funding Social Welfare Schemes In Breach Of EPF Act 1991 – Tony Pua – Saturday, 04 February 2012 07:57
Anyway, I'd love to hear what resources you have been using successfully and what you'd recommend for others. David Coffin's book is helpful when it comes to men's shirts but it left me with a few unanswered questions. I'll bring these with me to my session next Tuesday morning with Celebrity Sewing Guru. I can hardly wait.
Anyway, sleep well and dream of big American toy stores.
His friendship is one of the greatest gifts the blogoshpere has ever given me.
This was incredibly hard for me on so many levels, but I truly think, aside from being heartbroken, it was the loss of the life I thought we’d have together that hurt so much. I was never one of those girls who had a plan of any sort, really. I knew that I never wanted to drive a mini-van (please, God) or wear holiday sweatshirts with wreaths or turkeys on them. But other than that, you know … whatever. Then, while I was pregnant with our baby, something happened. I found myself so blissed out from all the love and devotion that man showed me, that I formed a picture in my head of what life could be like. That picture grew until it was like I had tunnel vision. All my defenses were down, my trust was absolute. That’s when he yanked the rug out from under me.
Spoon the berry mixture into the center of the dough, leaving a 1 inch border.
consistent with their respective
Another unexpected aspect is the depth and breadth of Cats’ education. An autodidact with a voracious appetite for books, Cats is happy to give the impression of being an ignorant, unlearned gangster, in part because his modus operandi depends on wrong-footing those who underestimate him. At one point, accused of coasting through his university education, and thus wasting it, Russell announces that he could quite easily write a term paper on HUCKLEBERRY FINN without applying himself too seriously to reading it: “You could write a paper now?” Shushan said. “On Huckleberry Finn?”
Now that’s over, we can start the summary of the awesometacular book. Go!
Lim had come under fire from numerous parties, who demanded that he apologise to the Sultan of Johor for his alleged statements made during a luncheon function in Singapore last month.
To re create this look Nic used ;
"I don't know," he said, heavily. "What I've done is my job."
The answer is simple.
He had figured out that in the dark, the only thing really notable about his appearance would have been the glint of the chain around his neck, visible easily above his low cut crew neck shirt. It held the shape of an upside down teardrop, meaning that something hung from it, yet that something was mostly hidden beneath his shirt. An obscure Saint’s medallion, a one-of-a-kind piece with the bust of a man and some grapes on the front and the outline of a voluptuous woman hidden on the back rested on his chest, hung on a chain of heavy silver.
Happy National Scrapbooking Day!
So I feel really good about holding on to all these products after seeing my scrapbook page!
Week 5: Multimedia Strategies
Without our mothers, the Circle Game would never unfold. Enjoy one of my favourite songs-- Joni Mitchell's Circle Game.
with it's t-shirt shops and candy stores.
Zombie is a low-budget movie about someone, I think a girl, who goes to a remote island to look for someone else, maybe her father. I can't remember, because it's been a long time since I saw this movie and because the plot was absolutely inconsequential. This movie is about gore, and it delivers. There's one scene involving the close-up of an eye and a large piece of wood. It does not end well, for the eyeball or the wood. I will never forget it. I'm not sure if that's good or bad, but for a single scene to stick in my memory after decades...well, that's an impactful scene. And as horror goes, this scene is truly horrible. Seriously. (NOTE: I am not recommending that you do this, but just as an FYI, if you were to search for "Big Fucking Splinter to the Eyeball" on YouTube, you could see what I am talking about.)
Domestic Intelligence (DOMINT)
The Liberal Democrats are using this as an opportunity to desperately regain their status from the LRA as opposition in the council. As a national party it was very damaging to them to lose this in the first place, and also shows the complete lack of trust Residents have in the main parties.
Then to add insult to injury, our cat, Acadia (Cadi) wasn't feeling well. Last week we took her in to the vet for a probable UTI and they treated her for that. But this week she wasn't seeming any better so I took her in to the vet on Tuesday morning so they could check her out. Long story short, they drew blood and found out her kidneys were failing. They then hooked her up to an IV drip for 48 hours to try to flush her kidneys out and hit her with a couple of different antibiotics. (Meanwhile, Wednesday was your daddy's and my anniversary and yesterday was his birthday.) But then yesterday they called and told me that her kidney levels hadn't budged and that she had bleeding ulcers in her mouth as a result of the kidney failure. Basically, there was nothing they could do and she would need to be put to sleep. =- (
Having managed to survive the horror, we went back to the hotel to drink champagne and wait for the rain to stop.
You might not actually. Some days, there’s very little to like. Often women have given up a prestigious career to pursue motherhood, and they are now at the beck and call 24/7 of someone who doesn’t always know what they want. Their days are usually made up of endless cooking, cleaning and washing. There’re dirty nappies to change, vomit to clean up, and food splatters to wipe down. You have to do it day after day and nobody seems especially grateful. To top it all off, people often talk to you like you lost half your brain in child birth and society does not seem to value your role. If you don’t like the role of motherhood, I don’t blame you. That doesn’t mean you don’t love your kids. To maintain your sanity, though, I suggest you stop trying to be a good mother and continue as you are. Like the rest of us, you’re probably doing a better job than you think.
will disappear for a while and you will have to re-update grub.
My purse is from H&M and Ive had it for a day lol.. I have somewhat of a bag and wallet addicting too.
Later, looking for a place to buy, things were a bit easier…but not much.
I am slowly working myself out of leisure mode. We are home from a week long family vacation to the Rocky Mountains. Our first few days in Denver reminded me that I am not a big city girl at heart. Our cabin, which was dropped in a crevice between mountains with a loud stream bubbling through the back yard, was lovely. It reinforced, however, the fact that I really do prefer to see farther than the next bend in the road. There were an awful lot of bends in those roads.
More pride in his glory, More hope in his word,
One may be able to infer certain character traits, opinions and behaviours from a person’s religion. Catholics don’t generally like condoms, Muslims aren’t too hot on homosexuals and Zen Buddhists aren’t inclined towards procrastination. These are not merely traits that are common among populations adhering to one set of beliefs or another, these are actually enshrined in the teachings of the religions themselves. This cannot be said of atheism, which has no teachings, sacred texts, belief system, tenet or dogma.
Got da pigskin to da ‘zone.
We recommend that you:
Third email from Boston Athletic Association telling us again (in case we missed the first two emails) that it’s going to be very hot, and if we do decide to run to understand that this race is not one for personal records and that it will be imperative to adjust accordingly, i.e. hydrate well
Today’s book is not like any that I’ve featured here yet. The Raising, by Laura Kasischke, which is brand new this month (and unfortunately, this means I haven’t had a chance to read it yet!), will have you on the edge of your seat. Noted as “part Stephen King, Part Donna Tartt, and wholly unforgettable” it is a gripping psychological thriller.
Step 1: Apply colors to applicator pad and directly to egg if desired. (this gives spots of "clear" color)
BM: Yeah I think so, and it tells about the actual decisions and how our history depends on people’s character in moments of crisis.
O'Hanlon's Brewing Co. Ltd. Thomas Hardy's Ale 1986
A suspect was identified and a foot pursuit commenced. The suspect was apprehended around 10 am on Sunday morning and is currently in custody. The investigation is ongoing and further details are unavailable at this time.
What is supposed to happen is the parts that are received into the store against a job card are to be placed into their relevant tub in the workshop immediately. The leading hand is then to periodically check the tubs to see if all the items have arrived, according to the requisition and if they have then they can then appoint the job to one of the trades people. Because these jobs aren’t a priority they have been put back again and again until they have been somewhat forgotten.
When you have done a good thing, by assisting someone and making their life better and easier, it feels like you are inwardly smiling.
I explained to an advisor this morning that I was feeling depressed because I apply for jobs everyday and don’t hear anything back. She said I shouldn’t take it to heart and its not personal as hundreds of people are applying for one job. I know she’s right but its still hard not to take it to heart. She suggested if things get really bad then I should see my GP and try and get a medical certificate for depression and my disability as she could see I was struggling to walk, especially as I now have to walk around with a stick because my right hip as started to wear away now and its agony to move. I never even thought about it but she made a good point, it would give me a few weeks off to get my head together and I wouldn’t have to attend meetings for a little while. I said I’d have a think about it. But I don’t want to give up, I’m not that person anymore.
Do read!
3. I fancy myself an artist. Unfortunately, laziness and procrastination make for few masterpieces.
5 PM/Live on Five: Danita Harris and Lee Jordan
This really did happen. It happened in Cherry Hill School District in New Jersey, to a little boy named Akian. You see, the reason we know these things happened is because his dad sent him to school with a wire. He was so desperate to get to the bottom of things, he had to resort to wiring his child to get answers. What he got was hours of recorded evidence of the teachers having inappropriate conversations and bullying his son.
All the baby mamas (all the baby mamas)
The U.S. Federal Reserve has printed a whopping $1.963 trillion dollars.
Look around see what you do
And I fully agree. Isn't it true though?
the UK, with parts dating back to 1380. The pub's website suggests
As for Army and St. Francis of New York, both are currently in 8th place in their respective conferences, which does not exactly scream “potential tourney run”, especially for Army, since there are only eight teams in the Patriot League.
Despite these limitations, Hofstede is useful because it provides us with a starting point and a point of comparison for different people from different cultures. So that’s something, right?
Still, for Lawton and the throngs of philistines who so thoughtlessly perpetuate his views, this is not enough. Guardiola is merely ‘delaying the end of charmed existence’ in skulking off as a ‘martyr’ bemoaning the job’s suffocating stress. Feguson has lasted 26 years, how can Guardiola be drained after 4? Again, predictably it just isn’t that cut-and-dried. Manchester United and Barcelona are both huge clubs who exist in the glare of a global audience but in Spain the pressure is different. England doesn’t have their culture of sports dailies and the resultant endless thirst to fill them. Everything is analysed, interpreted, twisted and reported. Everything. The culture of Barcelona also dictates that games are not only won but won in a certain way; Manchester United fans of course demand that their team attacks but are generally happy for that to be counter-attack (why else would Dimitar Berbatov’s redundancy be countenanced?). Barcelona’s are not. Guardiola is representing not only a club but an entire region, one that sees itself as separate from Spain and quite aside from facing such expectation, is expected to do so with a flourish. Although evidently fiercely proud and privileged to lead his team, under such circumstances, 4 years can seem an awful lot longer. And certainly under such circumstances, with the accompanying style and success, 4 years can comfortably be enough to anoint greatness.
You don't come across this kind of fun fabric often. I have quite a limited amount of it. So a careful plan of use is important. I thought of fun and trendy dresses with a winter length and lovely collar.
Oh, and word on the street is that something exciting will be happening at Kraftin' Kimmie Stamps this week!! Make sure to check in at the KKS Blog on Monday to find out the details!
Good Afternoon crafters
Given the most recent and stressful event in our lives this will be the first time we go out to a really awesome event as a family and can really truly enjoy it.
He created her.
Mr Poole said it was disappointing that NZ was now echoing Australia’s divisive political debate over refugee boats. ”There’s no danger of either of us being swamped,” he said.
David Martin, a Denver software engineer, estimates he’ll save at least $150 per month on gas with his new Chevrolet Volt compared with the 2010 Acura TSX he replaced. Martin expects gas prices to stay high, a factor that heavily influenced his purchase.
Barbara
Carver’s prose would not have been the same without Lish’s input. And if you want to see this for yourself, The New Yorker published Carver’s original draft of his famous story What We Talk About When We Talk About Love, with his editors corrections visible. I recommend you all to read it, in full, and when you do, you will see that Lish’s contribution is huge. He even came up with the title (it was originally called Beginners - not quite as catchy).
During my presentation, I deliberately give the audience a very open task, which can be completed in any number of ways. Yet despite this freedom, I get the same results virtually every time. For me, this begs a question about the tasks we set people in real life:
I don’t have any issues with the 4th of July as our nations Independence Day, but I do sit and wonder how many people really truly understand what they are celebrating. It just seems for the most part that people are more caught up in the act of celebrating, buying fireworks and lots of stuff they don’t really need without giving much thought to the reason for the holiday.
Our middle child regaled us with his adventures in his P.E. class. So, what made him so happy about this particular edition of today’s physical education class?
WE DON'T FEEL ALONE when we SEE YOUR STRUGGLE.
Believe it or not, until yesterday, I had never ever been to a screening that was part of New York's Tribeca Film Festival, which this year began this past Wednesday and is running until May 2. I'm not sure why this was the case; maybe, for all these years, I really didn't take this festival all that seriously in comparison to, say, the more widely celebrated Sundance, Cannes, Toronto or New York film festivals.
When she awoke, it was to find herself curled up in a haystack; her bleeding had stopped, her clothes were repaired and the green light from the forest appeared to be shining brightly again around her, so much so that it caused her to squint and shield her eyes.
Santa Fe Art Institute on the campus of the College of Santa Fe
TheMadHatter has a summer job which she will begin next week. She is going to be a nanny for a friend for the summer. It will be 3 days a week. Great opportunity for her. She’s really looking forward to it. She is working for such a nice family!
We are to know our biblical doctrines so not to be deceived by false doctrine. Beware of human cunning by crafty schemes. Paul exhorts the elect to not walk as the gentiles do. They are darkened in their understanding and alienated from a life with God, there is none righteous no one understands, no one seeks God, no one does good. (Roman 3:11)
They say that, unlike dogs, cats can’t show emotions via facial expressions. After viewing the contempt in his face that’s shown in this picture, I challenge anyone to agree with that contention.
“We don’t care about his race,” she said. “We consider him one of us.”
Selfishly, I suppose that by naming the Curse, it may also free us from any form of residual guilt.
One night Brody and Trevor were in the hall between their bedrooms and Brody hollers out (much too late) that Trevor has the crayons. Well, the crayons should only be on the craft table in the playroom. I walk back there and this is what I find.
More to come on my save-the-date ideas. For now, here's what I've been thinking about for our outfits...
The Lure of Community
I just find the whole thing irksome.
so that the interested parties know what i've re-ripped/updated...
26. Back Up Offa Me
I nearly cried when I saw it.
And I do.
The whole point is NO ONE knows where they are going (even when we think we do). Today, at 3:30, those three cars were all going somewhere, and then they weren’t. I thought I was destined for a dozen other things, but I am not even close to any of those dreams.
Little Yellow Bicycle Paper and stickers
K - Character gains a flask of decent mead.
It's a good news/bad news situation for believers in the 2012 Mayan apocalypse. The good news is that the Mayan "Long Count" calendar may not end on Dec. 21, 2012 (and, by extension, the world may not end along with it). The bad news for prophecy believers? If the calendar doesn't end in December 2012, no one knows when it actually will — or if it has already.
and when it became obvious that nobody was buying the shit, i was once again tossed away.
This morning I did the workout of the day after class was over and I was by myself in the box. That’s starting to become more usual for me, and while it can be hard to push myself, I have started to appreciate the solitude. The workout felt solid,and I felt good about my performance overall. And then I thought, I really should see if I can do those chest-to-bar pull-ups. Pull-ups are tough, one of those bodyweight gymnastics movements that may have seemed easy when you were a 40-pound child going wild at the playground monkey bars, but I can do them. Mind you, however, I haven’t attempted a chest-to-bar pull-up since a year ago, and then only because it was part of the Crossfit Games workouts. Back then I was hoping to accomplish 1 in the allotted time, and I think I managed 10 total, with a lot of crazy effort and encouragement from my coach.
As an University of Illinois -Urbana-Champaign undergraduate, I didn't have many friends really, and I wish I could say that it was because I was queer. It wasn't--I was a geek. All during my undergraduate years, I worked at Kay-bee Toystore. I wasn't a good employee. I perpetually claimed that I had an ingrown toenail so I didn't have to walk through the aisles and straighten the boxes. My alliance all that time was with a black stool stored just for me behind the cash register.
You may be right. The school certainly maintains that it was all a misunderstanding.
There is some evidence that the blue diamond resurfaced in London by 1813 and was owned by a jeweler Daniel Eliason by 1823. No one is sure that the blue diamond in London was the same one stolen from the Garde-Meuble because the one in London was of a different cut. Yet, most people feel the rarity and perfectness of the French blue diamond and the blue diamond that appeared in London makes it likely that someone re-cut the French blue diamond in the hopes of hiding its origin. The blue diamond that surfaced in London was estimated at 44 carats.
C&D: Cease And Desist letters. When the copyright owner requests you stop.
To put it bluntly, many on Wall Street still see the events leading up to the financial crisis as a case of banks having legitimately sold something - whether it be mortgages or securities backed by those loans - that someone wanted to buy.
I have been toying with the idea of adding this extra mile to my ride for a while now. Yesterday I kicked myself for ‘not going the extra mile’ because I was afraid I would be late to work and I made the excuse that I was going the extra mile by getting home early and in a cheerful and un-rushed way waking my boys and breakfasting them before school. (The extra in that scenario is doing it in a cheerful manner.) Today I rode the extra mile times two (because I like odd numbers better than even ones) and still made it home in time to breakfast and to carry the five year old to the car because he wasn’t feeling well…AND I did it cheerfully…(sort of.)
In that regard we are only talking the documentary film world reporting on the real world. But the Oscar race is a clue to a bigger real world story. That bigger story is about how the New York Times could become a significantly greater paper by setting aside its misplaced bet that it can get away with sidestepping proper coverage of important local news stories like Atlantic Yards or Columbia University’s the similarly problematic use of eminent domain to take over West Harlem or. . . the list of stories goes on. It is a long one because everything is connected.
For these ATCs, I started with some hand carved block prints that I had printed with lime paint on white paper. They are part of my edzellinni fabric line that I did for my SAQA visioning project. I combined the blockprints in photoshop, and then added the word lime and the mirror image of the word. I arranged the words at the top and bottom, but cut off part of each to make the words less obvious.
Attending Harvard Medical School should have boosted her self-esteem, but when she is an extern at Dr. Hans Zimmermann's medical institute in Germany, her idol abuses and ridicules Cassie, too. Tormented and humiliated, she has an emotional breakdown while Ingrid von Horne, Zimmermann's assistant and lover, witnesses her psychotic behavior. The two become close friends when she nurses Cassie back to health.
this week's challenge theme is "celebrate new life"!
I cannot explain the pure joy in being able to state this poem earnestly tonight. Nor can I articulate how it’s possible to say it faithfully as a Christian. I cannot argue that I can faithfully affirm the exaltation of life and glory of my own existence without threatening God’s sovereignty and supremacy. But I know with complete assure that I can. That these things are not mutually exclusive. And that they aren’t meant to be. But what I can do is repeat it for you.
Finally, the Applicant might have strengthened his position by making arguments for dependent claims which more clearly spelled out the type of error meant by "hardware error," e.g., memory read error.
The Spring/Summer 2012 Idea Book was released on February 1st. It is full of card and scrapbook ideas using spring and summer colors. There are eight new paper packets that will help you make perfect spring/summer scrapbook layouts and/or beautiful seasonal greeting cards. Be sure to contact me to get your copy of this new catalog.
I wish Mom were still around to tell me all the details for my story. I wish I’d asked her many more questions about her life in Vienna before the war, her experiences traveling to and in London during the war, and more details about how she got to America in 1943. I’m filling in what I don’t know with research from books, a visit to the Holocaust Museum library and photo archives in Washington, DC, last week, and interviews with living survivors who were children and young teenagers in Vienna at the same time.
Critical Examination: First off, the cover of the book couldn’t be more boring…someone should be fired for that decision-it definitely won’t be picked up on a whim (aside from the award). Where Things Come Back is the winner of the American Library Association’s 2012 Michael L. Printz award for excellence in young adult literature and deservingly so. Every part of this book rings true; adolescent dialogue, variety of believable family relationships; the struggle of a teen boy to deal with vitally emotional issues instead of turning typical teen drama into high drama. The male characters are sympathetic, sensitive young men who are trying to figure out life. Well-written and thought provoking, heart-warming and heart-wrenching, it is reminiscent of both The Catcher in the Rye and To Kill A Mockingbird. I was wondering all along why I was having to read about a religious missionary at odd intervals in the book and was figuring the story would play in at some point…when it did, it was shocking and completely unexpected-a great story!!
photos Brunch at Saks
Ginger White’s claim on Monday that she had a 13-year affair with Herman Cain threw a new wrench into the Georgia businessman’s beleaguered campaign. In the two days since, many people — both supporters and critics of Cain — have questioned whether he should remain in the race for the Republican presidential nomination. Cain himself said on a conference call on Tuesday that he was “reassessing” his campaign, but his chief of staff, Mark Block, said it was a reassessment of strategy, not of whether to end the campaign altogether.
I had to pry myself out of the motorela, a vehicle built around a small motorcycle. Two passengers sit beside the driver, and four are jammed into two tiny seats facing each other behind him.
As I ponder these questions, fashionistas who have mastered the art of conservative dressing are welcome to weigh in.
Well, the answer can be found in what Mugabe has termed the 'Second Liberation'. The First Liberation obviously being de-colonialization followed by black self-rule. Brushing aside the obligatory old-hat Marxist rhetoric and fashionable anti-White platitudes, one quickly comes to the stark realization that what Mugabe has in mind is firstly, a recipe for ruin untold and, secondly, rationally unavoidable.
From where will the LORD meet with Moses? (The LORD will meet with Moses from above the cover and between the two cherubim.)
Life is a work in progress. A constantly evolving adventure.
J had put the dogs out when it all started because they didn't know WHAT to do with a screaming injured kid. When Monk started to get his wits about him, he wanted his dogs back inside. J told him that the screaming scared them, so if we let them back in, he had to try to stop screaming. It worked, by golly. The screaming stopped and he finally asked for a drink. Then a banana. Then some medicine because "my mouf hurts, Mama."
through the first year as a family of four that is.
Buff: What? Citronella? What ever for?
Your incarnations give refuge to cows, teachers, and gods.
Of course, this doesn’t go over well at all…so…long story short, I’m midway between Lindy’s house and another town farther away when my father calls back and says we need to be back as soon as possible. Well, that kicks Lindy into gear. Going 97 down the road, we’re barrelling towards the nearest gas station with a fire you haven’t felt in your gut since you last watched Blazing Saddles.
Felix Mediavillo of The Manila Bulletin Online reports, narco-politics has apparently found its way in the Philippines following reports that big-time drug lords financed the campaign of several elected officials.
There are LOTS of prizes to win, and something at every stop! We all have an image for you and you could also win one of 3 big prizes at the end of the hop, at the store blog! And don't forget about the candy giveaway too, see at the top of my sidebar:-)! You have until Sunday 6th to do the hop and winners will be announced on Monday!
Disclaimer: This post might get a little nerdy about electricity and such. Also, I am not an electrical engineer so I make no claims as to the accuracy of any statement in this post!
- One or more Daily Digests for news from other blogs (planned)
We must be warned by their example; let not that unbelieving heart be in us that was in them; exhort each other daily to cleave to the living God; lest, if we, do not, we, like them, may be hardened through the deceitfulness of sin. ~ Adam Clark
*shots are fired. Fade to black. To be continued…*
“How?” urged Grace, the reigning Bavarian hurling singles champion (under 16’s) and one-time lizard hypnotist. “That’s the first thing he’s said to us since we came down here – he’s not even said anything about doors leading to death, just that there are some doors – three, in fact – and that we have to select one of them. Come to think of it, he’s not even said that we have to go through one of them – just that we have to choose it. He might be asking us to pick one for him to go through, or to purchase at a mightily reasonable price, or it could just be a huge novelty Advent calendar to count down the final 3 days before Christmas.”
And here I said that I would be a much better blogger come 2011 and I am off to a pretty bad start. I think I do have a good reason though.....being pretty sick for the past week, so sick that I was sent to the ER 2 times in 4 days!! As you can image, blogging, as well as running, was pretty LOW on my to do list!
My kids have made me laugh quite a bit lately. I thought I'd share some of their "finer" moments with you ...
There are times when your challenge may seem impossible, or “challenging!” One thing training for my half-marathon taught me was to keep on trucking, the finish line will eventually come.
This Christmas, I went back to Cullman for the first time since the end of April, right after an F4 tornado swept away entire blocks of downtown (blog post on that here). Last time I was there, I was helping Jackie pick up the pieces of her childhood home.
phenomenon — affirmative action. Not in the legal sense, of course. But
(3) Even if they (Jesus followers) had been able to write it is unlikely that they would have preferred the written to the oral word. The whole Semitic tradition, as far back as their history goes, is contrary.
Another issue that I am dealing with is when I tell them that I am not interested (nicely, of course), they get all butt-hurt and start insulting me. Mehh..
TUESDAYS will be to highlight all that's Young Adult. See our new mem YATT Badge? Do you like it? For those wanting to participate, you can post on anything YA: about writing, book reviews, author interviews, giveaways, young adult lit, high school, CPs, all literary, craft/techniques, personal experiences from your youth you used in your writing, or your WS4U! progress update. I'll also personally include Q&A with a YA and any subject I post on a Tuesday from Oasis for YA. DON'T BLOG ON TUESDAYS? No Biggy. Just post on Wednesdays instead. I'll still link you to the list, stating that your a Wednesday poster!! DON'T WANT TO BLOG EACH WEEK ON YA? That's okay, too! I'll still leave you linked to my list.
1 teaspoon garlic powder, plus extra for seasoning chicken
-Yes yes..I know..and I find this to be very suspicious..its not how its supposed to be...
I'm also going to get back in touch with my local media (radio and tv)
I have a week off in February which I'd like to devote to the challenge.
I already work more hours per week than the average European,I really don’t mind working more for my family’s secure future.
Featured Product at the Goose: Fabric Baskets and Beanbag Sets by Shagbark Studio
Brents come out the aggressor. Kick by Griffin is caught and Bobby is on top of him. He has an arm trapped and is dropping some heavy strikes to the body.
by J. L. Carrell
I would like to believe that the tears of Julia Child was not just on the taste from the tart.
2.) A power to take away other peoples powers.
My Islam is Aisha standing her ground in a time when women were meant to be silent
I am so thankful that my Mother gave me this lesson early in my life to teach me responsibility. She is gone now but her lesson has stayed with me for the past sixty years. I am working now, albeit part-time. I will work until I can no longer function either mentally or physically. I know of no other way. Mom trained me well.
The quality has definitely improved over the years; this is possibly because writers are continually discovering the magazines. Styles and subject matters are always changing with the times: for instance we get more stories featuring gay/lesbian plot lines than when we first started. We get a lot more contemporary stories with a romantic theme nowadays and there seems to be a shortage of crime fiction (oops, perhaps I shouldn't have said that!). Perhaps that is because there seems to be a much larger proportion of submissions from women writers now?
Foundation for Individual Rights in Education
Circular No: 2011/04
Just words, eh?!
It's not so much that I'm angry that you used a dead being as a dress, but that the dead being served only one purpose. To perpetuate some lame image of eccentricity.
I need to read the FAQs PDQ to find the right PDF.
“No shit,” agreed Violet. She stepped up to the man and put a hand on his shoulder.
I had to get the Celtic harp string changed - the concert harp's gut strings take forever to settle in and I couldn't be tuning every 45 seconds through the event. So with a rush of adrenaline and one more heroic yank (and a really creative swear word), the string came through the hole. Victory! I wound it around the pin, tightened it up, brought it up to a little above pitch, stuffed the harp into its case and roared off to my gig.
Dessert: Mrs. Truman's Coconut Balls
In my hometown of Oakland, California, there’s a restaurant I hate.
“Well,” said Ted, “what about Gil Scott-Heron?” He sat swinging his weight on the stool; left to right. “The book you have on your shelf at home? It’s got nigger right there in the title. ”
The cash, from the Government’s Department for Communities and Local Government, will be spent on community projects to encourage integration.
Four health workers, including two doctors, were kidnapped by militants the week before Dale’s disappearance from the Pishin area of Baluchistan, near Quetta. They were freed after a shootout between police and their kidnappers.
Featherweight fans, I want to hear from you!
For those of you who aren’t familiar with this little place, it’s on Old Frankfort Pike (one of my favorite roads in the Lexington area), surrounded by dozens of horse farms. We drive by it almost every time we head to Louisville, and always say, “We should eat there someday.” Well, someday became Sunday, and we finally went!
Caramelized Cinnamon Apples
you can only save one picture & are limited in how much "paint" you can add to it, & you can't save the picture outside of the program. however, thanks to my handy-dandy mac feature that let's me do screen captures, i have several options to share with you.
Banana Man: Yeah, those guys failed miserably at boot camp. They were simply the pits. Not that they weren't nice fruit. For example Mr. Apple was a swell guy right to the very core.
I keep going in circles…
President Obama is polling in Jimmy Carter territory. Unions are less popular now than in many decades. Mutual weakness will draw Democrats and unions closer, despite labor’s discontents. But the closer to each other they get, the more swing voters will recoil from both.
But that's not the end of the story. Returning from DragonCon, I had barely walked in the door of my house when my home phone rang. It was Mitchell.
Who is gonna make it?
Moral: Don’t let the pain of one season destroy the joy of all the rest. Don’t judge life by one difficult season. Persevere through the difficult patches and better times are sure to come some time or later.
Have you ever wanted something so bad you could taste it? Then you wonder why you can’t have it? I know I have!
Today one of my friends asked if I could make meals for her aunt. Her aunt has fought uterine cancer in the past and last year went through a double mastectomy. Last week she went to the doctors as she has had a cold she couldn't kick. It appears that there are growths on her lungs and lymphnoids. My friend advised me that her aunt has never asked for help through her previous trials. However, she is acknowledging her need for help. She is not a believer and as a result does not have "A" church to help carry her through this. That doesn't mean that the church needs to abandon her.
I took an interest because I had been pondering if anti-depressants really have an effect on those taking them.
By 1611 Gutenberg presses were widespread. This fostered rapid distribution of the King James Bible throughout the English-speaking world.
In a large pot of salted water, boil pasta to al dente.
from the mists of time.
“Ugh! Not again.” He uttered in a fake-impatient voice. “Iqraaaaa, tell me.”
God has given us everything He has to give. We must not ignore the opportunity while we have it. He has given us Himself, through His Son and now through His Spirit. We must not loose or make light of our status with Lord Yahushua.
Mungo's Hi Fi ft Lady Anne - Sound Get A Beating
Today the science of the principles of chemical substances, molecules etc is creating its own kind of problems and debates. In every nook and corner of the world one can find an area which can be subjected to scientific research. No doubt man can take pride in all scientific discoveries/inventions that have been attained so far and yet we must realize that so much more remains yet a mystery that as of now it seems as though it is well nigh impossible to solve all scientific mysteries of the world. Man will realize his intellectual limitations when he will move on from analyzing the gross material world to the subtle and invisible world of consciousness.
144 N. Sixth Street
We’ve taken a number of steps to make sure that businesses are willing to invest, and that’s what the small business tax cuts and some of the tax breaks for companies that are willing to invest in plants and equipment — and zero capital gains for small businesses — that’s what that was all about, was giving businesses more incentive to invest.
Machine washable and dryer safe
that night is not eclipse,
All I know is that I can only write strong female characters. In hindsight, I'm not sure Ondine is strong enough in book one. But she is rowing her own boat, she's not at the mercy of the tide. By book two, she is the absolute driving force. I'm not just saying that, Stephanie Campisi agrees that I write healthy relationships.
10.Losing my memory! Or getting totally wasted! I can’t control myself sober! Imagine me drunk! Hell no!
Water Dragon
The shots off the porch were something someone in the country might do to make sure the intruders did not come back, Mr. Altman said. Mr. Neesmith, who has a chronic nerve condition in his right arm and hand as well as other health problems, had been woken up in the middle of the night. He was not thinking clearly, Mr. Altman said; he had no record, and by all accounts was a good man.
The main gallery was filled with One Hundred Fish Fountain (2005), which was actually only 97 fish. Which is kind of cool that it is three short. The fish swam in space. And the water squirting everywhere was like a simulation of being in a tank with the fish. The wires suspending the fish were twisted around the fins or threaded large eyelets. These came from a huge suspended metal grid structure. Again, the goal is hanging the heavy bronze fish more than making it look good. So the sloppy wires were juxtaposed with the highly detailed cast fish. And that results in an aesthetic of sorts.
I used the cutting file Puppy in present to create this holiday card. I switched it up a little bit and added the bow to the puppy's head instead of on top of the present. I finished it off with some ribbon and poinsettia. I think this may be a little foreshadowing of what is going to happen at my house this Christmas with our new puppy.
This was such a wonderful surprise to receive.
(My own most-admired creation of Lucien/Luciano in Stravaganza is hardly described physically at all. He has dark curly hair and a nice smile; that’s about it. Yet fourteen-year-old girls love him.)
To top it up all, i am grateful to all my family and friends for the great reception…
PEOPLE ARE NOT MACHINES
We can define efficiency informally as doing the most with the least. An efficient use of resources is thus one that puts as few resources as possible into places where they sit around doing nothing. The just-in-time ordering process that’s now standard in manufacturing and retail, for example, was hailed as a huge increase in efficiency when it was introduced; instead of having stockpiles sitting around in warehouses, items could be ordered electronically from a database so that they would be made and shipped just in time to go onto the assembly line or the store shelf. What nobody asked, and very few people have asked even yet, is what happens when something goes wrong.
33. The Dark and Hollow Places Carrie Ryan
Vaude Hogan XT
Always available to one and all
What does this mean about our place in the universe?
2 teaspoons ground cinnamon
This dude knows what’s what. Before he got the role as Jake Sully in Avatar, he was living in his car, FFS. He’s a bit of a grafter, is Sam Worthington. Although he grew up in Australia, he’s actually British, which technically means that he should marry me (yeah I know, that doesn’t make any sense. Go fuck yourselves. I think I have PMT). Do you know what’s weird? Half way through Avatar, I actually started fancying the blue panther-faced thing that Sam here did the voice of. That’s how sexual he is. Here’s a little anecdote you might enjoy – I met a guy a while back in a cafe who looked exactly like Sam Worthington. “You look exactly like Sam Worthington from Avatar”, I said. “OMG!” he said, “I really fancy him, he’s sooo hot! I can’t believe you think I look as fit as him!”. “Well, you do” said I. And then he said to me, “And do you know who you really look like? BRADLEY COOPER”.
On a different note, my vegetable garden is doing great for the most part. I'm having a hard time with the herbs but everything else seems to be doing OK. The Square Foot Garden is doing is doing amazingly well. I harvested the radishes yesterday, all 25 of them. I'm so happy with the turn out so far as I wasn't sure it was going to work. I am ready to replant that square but I don't know whether to transplant the cabbage I have been growing in a peat pot or whether I should plant something else and plant the cabbage when I harvest the pak choi.
Father Mine by J.R. Ward
Channel 3 - Airborne (Enigma 1984)
What is your company trying out, or looking into? Let’s talk about emerging approaches and new best practices – I’m happy to sit down with you and dialogue about what I’m seeing in the industry at large, and how your strategic plans may unfold in the future.
From a web site:
"And the ticking?" I hear you say. Well yes, I did come away with both pieces of ticking and also with a couple of paintings she didn't have the space for. I am thrilled to bits with my afternoon and with the treasure. I hope you have liked hearing about it all.
There you go, packaging that's the key.
Nigel Smith
I have NO idea why either?
The import thing it say after all that though is that no one "wins". Now you may be scoffing at that or wondering why I bring something like that up but anyone coming into this from modern Computer Roleplaying Games this can be quite a shock. Even just coming from the perspective of games in general this can be quite odd. The only thing I don't agree with is that it follows this revelation up with a wishy washy statement that basically comes down to saying no one "Loses" either. It may just be that I come from the game where Losing is !!Fun!! but I like to lose for a reason. If I do something stupid and my character dies, he died. Now pointless death isn't losing if you couldn't do anything about it, but whatever.
It wasn’t until 2008 that two mutual friends, one knowing the truth since before the birth, told the victim. 'Perhaps not surprisingly he felt shocked and numb,' the barrister said.
Turn over the page and under the heading Gargoyle, write from the gargoyle aspect of your personality.
Now we have come to the point where there are open attacks in the mainstream media. Yes, there have been attacks before, mostly in the trade press and on specialized sites and blogs on the Internet. It was more internecine conflict within the industry, narrow professional circles, and the activist community. But that doesn't really count as a public brawl when your true audience is the mass of nonspecialists. Now, we have the equivalent of that with the publication of a major piece in Nature, a respected scientific journal, but one that mere mortals are able to read. The piece in question has the reactionary forces in full attack mode.
Don’t give them any excuse to filter your application out.
Wonder if Stevie’s still telling the way it used to be. Wouldn’t mind seeing him pop his eye.
When I searched for 'NRA Protest Arch Grounds' nary a return came up, and instead more links for the above video. I received the digital equivalent of crickets.
Instead of relentlessly hunting Islamist madmen, we seek to appease them.
I was hungry and was only allowed to make cereal. When mommy asked me what I was doing from the bedroom I answered, “Getting breakfast.”
Yikes, by the end of this week maybe I'll settle on a title!
Prayer life: My goal is to live life inside of God’s will and purpose for me. In order to line up with God’s will, I am working to strengthen my prayer life. I feel this should be a great focus for my last 50 days. I want to build more quiet times of listening to God into my every day. Like brushing my teeth, I don’t want to start or end my day without doing it. Having 5 children makes this a challenge. But it is possible. I have been praying at the start of my day. And I’m reading the Gospel verses of the day most mornings now. It is the end of my day that needs that quiet listening the most, I think. And the morning could be stretched to a longer amount of quiet with Him.
The most notable trend to take away from 2009 would have to be the complete resurrection of the American comedy. Previously you could accredit NBC’s Thursday duo of 30 Rock and The Office at single handily holding the torch for good comedies, but in 2009 every network got in on the action (except The CW of course, seeing as though they don’t have a sense of humour.)
Take benefit of on-line buying to obtain fantastic footwear at reduced costs.
Which is not 100, so I'm calling myself less than totally ridiculous.
I debated about starting over, but then my husband saw this and fell in love with the 3D effect. He doesn't fall in love with that many of my projects, so I decided to forget both the steampunk and zentangle-inspired work (note: when doing crafts & art for the guys, 3D will probably be a popular choice, lol).
There. I said it. I know lots of people love her, but I don’t get the appeal. I don’t think she’s a particularly good singer, and I think her songs are kind of annoying and not that great. When I was in choir in high school, the Junior class girls had to perform “Holiday” for the annual variety show, and I heard that song so many times I wanted to rip off my own ears. So yeah, I think it’s a little ridiculous that she’s made colossal bank by being kind of overrated. By the same token, there are performers out there that I think are pretty kick-ass, like U2 and Paul McCartney, so I understand why they are so successful and make so much money. I’m not jealous of Madonnna because she’s rich and famous. This is probably shocking to people obsessed with being rich and famous, but I don’t think either of those things sound that great. I don’t dream of taking rides on shiny private jets, or having a hundred gold-plated toilets and a swimming pool filled with caviar and puppy farts. I’d like to just remain a regular, non-famous person who cooks her own food and does her own laundry, pay off my mortgage and student loans, spend time with my friends and family, and if I’m really lucky, keep writing things that a few unfortunate souls will find entertaining. And even if by some sick twist of fate I did become rich and famous, I would still think that Madonna kinda sucks.
